(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“The model's boyfriend, Zayn Malik posted a heartfelt message on Instagram with a photo of the two of them, adding, 'Happy birthday to my everything'.”
“Hadid also posted a photo of the two of them from the day, with her holding a giant birthday cake as he kissed her on the cheek.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“And it wasn't just her boyfriend showering her with birthday love.”
“The model shared photos of bouquets of flowers she'd received from her loved ones, including from Taylor Swift and Karlie Kloss.”
“Her family and friends also took to social media to share their love for the model.”
“From her parents to her model siblings and friend Lily Aldridge, see some of the sweet messages (and adorable throwback photos) below.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Zayn Malik, the model's boyfriend, sent a heartfelt message on instagram with photos of them and said," Happy Birthday to all of me. "
"Hadid also posted a picture of the two of them that day, with a huge birthday cake in her hand as he kisses her on the cheek."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"It's not just her boyfriend who gives her a birthday present."
The model shared photos of a bunch of flowers she had received from her loved ones, including Taylor swift and Carly Klaus
"Her family and friends also share their love for the model through social media."
"From her parents to her model siblings and friend Lily Aldrich, here are some sweet comments (and lovely backtracking photos)."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Only too happy to oblige, proud mum-to-be Khloe then gently caressed her tiny bump over her sparkly gown.”
“"We did abs and what else?”
“...criticised her workout regime...”
“The reality star, who is already six months gone, took part in a gruelling home workout alongside her sister Kourtney earlier this week.”
“However, Khloe's regime was soon met with criticism from some fans, though the KUWTK beauty didn't waste any time before putting them in their place.”
“(Image: Snapchat) (Image: Snapchat)She tweeted a link to an article stating 33 reasons why it is beneficial to work out while pregnant.”
“Khloe added: For the ones who think they are physicians all of a sudden but MY doctor and I communicate and my workouts are cleared and highly recommended.”
“"Thanks kiddos!”
“Don't make me stop sharing s**t."The video shared on social media showed 33-year-old Khloe flaunting her growing baby bump as she worked out in a pair of leggings and a black hoody.”
“(Image: Snapchat)At the end of the workout, Khloe told her fans: "Kourtney and I did a lot of other s**t that we didn't snap because it just wasn't cute.”


"I'd be happy to help, proud mother to be Carol gently stroking the little lump on her shining robe."
"We did the ABS. What else?"
“… Criticized her training plan... "
The reality TV star, who has been dead for six months, took a tough family exercise with his sister Courtney earlier this week
"However, Khloe's regime was quickly criticized by some fans, even though the kutek beauty didn't waste any time putting them in."
"(photo: snapchat) (photo: snapchat) she posted a link to an article on twitter explaining 33 reasons why exercising during pregnancy is good."
"Khloe added: for those who suddenly think they are doctors, but I communicate with my doctors, my exercise is clear and strongly recommended."
"Thank you, children!"
"Don't let me stop sharing s * * t." Videos shared on social media show Khloe, 33, wearing tight pants and a Black Hoodie, showing off her growing lump
"(image: snapchat) at the end of the training, Khloe told her fans," Kourtney and I did a lot of other moves, but we didn't take them because it's not cute. "



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Officials said the dressing down of the ceremony is due to time constraints placed by the special election and conflicts with Queen Elizabeth’s schedule.”
“This is the first time with “reduced ceremonial events” since 1974, according to the BBC.”
“This year’s speech had dramatically less fanfare surrounding it, with the queen arriving by car rather than horse-drawn carriage and wearing a suit and hat instead of ceremonial robes and a crown.”
““Her Majesty is being kept informed and will attend Royal Ascot as planned this afternoon.”As per tradition, the queen gave a speech to Parliament Wednesday morning announcing the government’s legislative agenda.”
““Prince Philip is in good spirits and is disappointed to be missing the State Opening of Parliament and Royal Ascot,” said Buckingham Palace in a statement on Wednesday.”
“His hospitalization forced him to miss the opening of Parliament on Wednesday.”
“Last month, the family announced that 96-year-old Philip will be stepping away from public duties in the fall and begin moving toward retirement.”
“Queen Elizabeth’s husband is being monitored at King Edward VII Hospital in London as a precautionary measure, the BBC reports.”
“Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh, was hospitalized Tuesday evening due to an infection caused by a pre-existing condition, according to the BBC.”


"Officials said the dress up was due to the time limit of the special election, which conflicts with Queen Elizabeth's schedule."
According to the BBC, this is the first time since 1974 that "ritual activities have been reduced"
"This year's speech was obviously less public. The queen arrived in a car instead of a carriage, wearing a suit and hat instead of a robe and crown."
"Her Majesty is learning about the situation and will attend the Royal Ascot meeting this afternoon as planned." As usual, the queen announced the government's legislative agenda in a speech to parliament on Wednesday morning
"Prince Philip is in a good spirit and is disappointed to miss the opening ceremony of Parliament and Royal Ascot," Buckingham Palace said in a statement on Wednesday
"His hospitalization forced him to miss the opening of Parliament on Wednesday."
Last month, the Philips family announced that the 96 year old would step down from public office in the fall and begin to retire
Queen Elizabeth's husband is under custody at King Edward VII hospital in London as a precaution, BBC reported
"Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh, was hospitalized on Tuesday night with an infection caused by a pre-existing disease, according to the BBC



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'That's why Kourtney has been letting her stay at her place because she's been super stressed out, and really concerned about it.”
“...which has been extremely stressful for her...”
“Wasser also represents Kourtney Kardashian and oversaw Kim's divorce from Atlanta Hawks star Kris Humphries, which was finalized in April 2013.”
“She has been taking advice from Los Angeles divorce lawyer Laura Wasser, 49.”
“Larsa, meanwhile, is hoping to overturn the prenup and get 'as much money as she can', according to insiders.”
“Scottie also wants to avoid making any alimony payments to his estranged wife, 'including permanent, rehabilitative, durational, bridge-the-gap or lump sum'.”
“Though Larsa signed a prenup before the marriage in 1997, she said the couple signed a Revocation of Prenuptial Agreement in 2015The documents also reveal he wants to relocate the children to Chicago, something Larsa said she was against in her filings.”
“Court documents obtained by DailyMail.com reveal Scottie is asking to not pay alimony.”
“Scottie is now demanding it be enforced, as well as asking for shared custody of the couple's four children and a 'greater share' of the couple's marital assets.”
“Court records obtained by DailyMail.com show the document was signed on July 17 1997 – three days before their wedding in Chicago, Illinois.”


"That's why Courtney keeps her at home because she's so stressed and really worried."
“… It's a lot of pressure on her... "
"On behalf of Kourtney Kardashian, Wasser also oversees King's divorce from Atlanta Hawks star Chris Humphries, which was finalized in April 2013."
"She's been listening to Laura Wasser, a divorce lawyer in Los Angeles. She's 49 years old."
"At the same time, according to people familiar with the matter, Lhasa hopes to overturn the prenuptial agreement and get" as much money as possible. "
"Scotty also wants to avoid paying any alimony to his separated wife," including permanent alimony, rehabilitation alimony, long-term alimony, bridging the gap or one-time alimony. "
"Although Lhasa signed a prenuptial agreement before getting married in 1997, she said the couple signed an agreement in 2015 to cancel the prenuptial agreement. The documents also revealed that Lhasa wanted to move her children to Chicago, and Lhasa said she opposed that in her submission. "
"Court documents revealed in the daily mail that Scotty asked not to pay alimony."
"Scotty is now asking for enforcement, as well as mutual custody of four children and a 'greater share' of the marital property."
"The daily mail of court records shows that the document was signed on July 17, 1997, three days before their wedding in Chicago, Illinois."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My bitterness would probably run longer than the actual marriage.”
“When those breakup reports initially surfaced, Eve said that they’re not speaking and that whether or not the breakup rumours were true, she wouldn’t change her mind.”
“The story went wide.”
“As I noted at the time, however, it’s f-cking Star Magazine.”
“They get one thing right all year.”
“And, as it turns out, it’s not this.”
“PEOPLE actually followed up with their own report shortly after with sources refuting the breakup claims, saying that Ewan and Mary were still together, no split.”
“Ewan and Mary were seen holding hands on the set of her new film this week – Daily Mail has the exclusive photos.”
“Clearly not broken up then.”
“Which most likely means that he and his estranged wife Eve Mavrakis will move ahead with the divorce.”


"My pain may last longer than my actual marriage."
"When the reports of the breakup first surfaced, Eve said they didn't say anything and that she would not change her mind whether the breakup rumors were true or not."
"The story is wide."
"But, as I said at the time, it's a damn Star Magazine."
"They did one thing right all year."
"It turns out that's not the case."
"In fact, people soon published their own reports, and a source refuted the claim that Ivan and Mary were still together and did not break up."
"Ivan and Mary were seen hand in hand shooting her new film this week - the daily mail has exclusive photos."
"That obviously didn't break up."
"It probably means that he and his separated wife, Eve mavrakis, will continue to divorce."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...hope not — Wendy's (@Wendys) May 9, 2018Apparently Wendy's super bowl ad trolling Mickey D's wasn't enough social media savagery for one year.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“ pic.twitter.com/KMBktLPLfl — Burger King (@BurgerKing) May 9, 2018"@wendys looking forward to it.”
“...let’s aim for king and queen of prom.”
“@wendys looking forward to it.”
“.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Ok, but don’t get handsy and we have to be home by 10. https://t.co/tQunlsqecG — Wendy's (@Wendys) May 9, 2018Burger King then changed their sign and it's pretty adorable.”


“… I hope not - Wendy's (@ Wendys) May 9, 2018 obviously, Wendy's Super Bowl ad is not barbaric enough for social media in one year. "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
“  pic.twitter.com/KMBktLPLfl Website - Burger King may 9, 2018 "@ Wendys is looking forward to it."
"Let's aim at the king and queen of the ball."
"@ Wendy is looking forward to it."
“.”
"This content was imported from twitter."
"All right, but don't be too handsome. We have to be home by 10 o'clock. https://t.co/tQunlsqecG-Wendy 's (@ Wendys) on May 9, 2018, Burger King changed their sign. It's very cute. "



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...kimkardashian/Instagram...”
“Well, yes and no.”
“Kris Jenner told Kim to wash her face with a really hot washcloth and then use it to exfoliate your skin.”
“Dermatologists say hot water may be harsh for your skin and may not be beneficial in the long run.”
“Kim Kardashian West and Kris Jenner are so intertwined when it comes to their professional lives that it's sometimes easy to forget that they're mother and daughter.”
“Sure, we all know they're related.”
“But Kris and Kim the brand (both individually, and as a pair) is so strong that thinking of them as a mother-daughter duo sometimes comes second.”
“But just like you and your mom, Kris and Kim went through the same mother-daughter things that most of us do.”
“And, yes, that includes the passing down of beauty tips.”
“I talked to Kardashian West about her new cosmetics collection, and she shared the one Kris Jenner-approved beauty tip that's stuck with her all these years.”


“… Kim kardashan / instagram... "
"Well, yes or no."
"Chris Jenner told Kim to wash his face with a very hot towel and use it to exfoliate."
"Dermatologists say hot water can be irritating to your skin and may not be good in the long run."
"Kim Kardashian West and Kris Jenner are so intertwined in their professional lives that sometimes it's easy to forget that they are mother and daughter."
"Of course, we all know they are relatives."
"But Chris and King's brands (both individually and as a couple) are so strong that sometimes they come in second as a mother daughter duo."
"But just like you and your mother, Chris and Kim have experienced the mother daughter relationship that most of us have experienced."
"And, yes, it includes the passing on of beauty tips."
"I talked to Kardashian West about her new cosmetics line, and she shared a beauty tip that Chris Jenner recognized, which has been bothering her."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“With reporting by Marc Lupo...”
““Everyone always thinks of me as the rule breaker and the troublemaker,” the former Fox News contributor said.”
“Jedediah Bila and her fiancé, Jeremy Scher, are married, Us Weekly can confirm.”
“The 39-year-old former View cohost and her love tied the knot in Huntington, New York, on Saturday, February 17.”
““As 60 of their closest family and friends filled the room, Jedediah walked down the aisle as Jeremy beamed with joy — you could truly feel the love in this magical evening!” wedding planner Michael Russo tells Us.”
“The glowing bride opened up to Us and shared exclusive details of the happy couple’s fairytale wedding.”
““I’m super excited.”
“Super, super excited,” Bila told Us.”
““I always wanted to get married, but I never thought I would do the big wedding dress and the beautiful venue.”
“I always thought I was gonna be on a beach somewhere, just a couple of friends, doing it really casual.”


"Mark Lupo's story..."
"Everyone thinks I'm a rule breaker and trouble maker," said a former fox news writer
American weekly confirmed that jadidia bila and her fiance Jeremy Schell are married
On Saturday, February 17, in Huntington, New York, the 39 year old former "view" cohabitant married her lover
"When their closest 60 family members and friends filled the room, jededia walked down the aisle, and Jeremy's face was filled with a smile of joy - you can really feel love on this magical night!"! "Wedding planner Michael lasso told us."
"The radiant bride opened her heart to us and shared the exclusive details of the fairy tale wedding of the happy couple."
"I'm super excited."
"Super, super excited," bila told us
"I've always wanted to get married, but I never thought I would make a big wedding dress and a beautiful venue."
"I always thought I'd be on the beach somewhere, just a few friends, doing it casually."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And that same month, the actress made a solo appearance when she co-hosted the Global Gift Gala to raise funds for the victims of the recent earthquakes in Mexico.”
“It’s him, he makes it all worth it,” Longoria told PEOPLE during the French Riviera soirée.”
“The former Desperate Housewives star, 42, is expecting her first child with husband José “Pepe” Antonio Bastón, her rep confirms to PEOPLE.”
“The actress is four months along with a son.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Bastón, 49, is president of Televisa, the largest media company in Latin America.”
“The couple, who began dating in 2013 and were engaged in Dubai in December 2015, were married in May 2016 under a stunningly lit altar in Mexico.”
“The star-studded party even included a fireworks display.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pascal Le Segretain/amfAR15/WireImageEva Longoria and José Antonio Baston in 2015Image zoomEva Longoria at the L’Oreal Paris Women of Worth Celebration 2017 on Dec. 6In May, the parents-to-be celebrated their one-year wedding anniversary during the Cannes Film Festival.”
““I never thought I would get married again.”


"In the same month, the actress also attended a global gift raising event for earthquake victims in Mexico
"It's him who makes everything worth it," Longoria told people at the French Riviera party
The agent of the 42 year old former Desperate Housewives star has confirmed to people that she and her husband Jose Pepe Antonio Baston will have their first child
"The actress is four months old and has a son."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Baston, 49, is the president of Televisa, the largest media company in Latin America
"The couple started dating in 2013, got engaged in Dubai in December 2015 and married under a brightly lit altar in Mexico in May 2016."
"The starry party even includes fireworks."
"Credit for image zooming: Pascal Le segreat / amfar15 / wireimageeva Longoria and Jos é Antonio Baston at the 2015 image zoomeva Longoria women of worth celebration in L'Oreal, Paris on December 6, 2017, the parents will celebrate their anniversary during the Cannes Film Festival."
"I never thought I would get married again."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“On Tuesday, actress Bethan Nash Instagrammed a personal letter from the couple as well as a photo of the bouquet they sent, after George and Amal enjoyed a recent showing of My Fair Lady at The Mill at Sonning in England.”
“"Amal and I wanted to thank you for a fantastic night of theatre,” the note to the cast reads.”
““We loved every minute of it.”
“You were all so wonderful.”
“My extended family (half of Beirut) loved it too.”
“Thank you and have a great run.”
“Love, George and Amal.”The sweet gesture was very much appreciated.”
“"This is better than fairy dust!"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
On Tuesday, actress Bethan Nash uploaded a personal letter and a photo of the couple's bouquet after George and Amar recently watched my fair lady perform in the Songning factory in the UK
"Amar and I want to thank you for a wonderful evening at the theatre," the crew wrote
"We love every minute of it."
"You are wonderful."
"My extended family (half of Beirut) also likes it here."
"Thank you. Have a nice trip."
"Love you, George and Amar." This sweet gesture is very grateful
"This is better than Xianchen!"



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And that is the thing I want my daughter to have — I always want her to feel loved,” the proud dad said.”
“During a recent interview with NPR, Bradley candidly opened up about how becoming a first-time dad has changed his outlook on life and how little Lea has influenced his acting career.”
“According to a new report, the 43-year-old actor and his Russian model fiancée, 32, are ready to expand their family and have a second baby.”
““They’ve started trying for another baby,” a source close to the couple — who are already parents to a one-year-old daughter named Lea De Seine Shayk Cooper — told Life & Style in the magazine’s latest issue, on newsstands now.”
““Bradley and Irina are hoping to make Lea a big sister next year,” the insider continued.”
““The funny thing is that Bradley’s been staying that he’d be happy with another little girl.”
“He wants Lea to have that special sisterly bond.”
“Irina’s the one who’s desperate for a boy!”“[They] have begun taking bets [on the gender] from friends and family.”
“Of course, at the end of the day what they both really want is a healthy baby,” the source added.”
““I guess having a kid, and having a family — which is a miracle and something I have always dreamt of — has opened me up even more, to the day, and to be present,” he said, according to Celebrity Insider.”


"That's what I want my daughter to have - I always want her to feel loved," the proud father said
"In a recent interview with NPR, Bradley frankly revealed how being a father for the first time had changed his outlook on life, while lea had little impact on his acting career."
"According to the latest report, the 43 year old actor and his 32 year old Russian model fiancee are planning to expand their family and have a second child."
"They've started to work for another child," a source close to the couple, who are the parents of a one-year-old daughter, Lea de Seine Shayk Cooper, said in the latest issue of life and fashion magazine, now
"Bradley and Elena hope to make Leah a sister next year," the person familiar with the matter continued
"It's interesting that Bradley stays here all the time and he'll be happy with another little girl."
"He wanted Leah to have that special sisterhood."
"Elena is the one who longs for boys! "(they) have started to bet (on gender) from friends and family."
"Of course, at the end of the day, what they really want is a healthy baby," the source added
"I think having children, having a family - which is a miracle and something I've always dreamed of - has opened my heart, opened my heart, opened my heart," he said, according to celebrity insider



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The producer denies any claims of non-consensual sex made against him.”
““I would call my female assistant ‘hot pants’ or ‘sex pants’ when I was yelling to her from the other side of the office.”
“In a lengthy statement posted on Twitter, the Super Size Me director revealed that he was once accused of rape and had settled a sexual harassment claim made by a female employee.”
“Spurlock also admitted to being “unfaithful to every wife and girlfriend I have ever had”.”
““As I sit around watching hero after hero, man after man, fall at the realisation of their past indiscretions, I don’t sit by and wonder ‘who will be next?’ I wonder, ‘when will they come for me?’” Spurlock wrote.”
“The director said that the allegation of rape occurred while he was at college.”
“While no charges or investigations were brought against him, the claimant named Spurlock in an essay on the incident that was read aloud in class.”
““In my mind, we’d been drinking all night and went back to my room,” he wrote.”
““We began fooling around, she pushed me off, then we laid in the bed and talked and laughed some more, and then began fooling around again.”
“We took off our clothes.”


"The producer denied any involuntary acts against him."
"When I yell at a female assistant on the other side of the office, I call her hot pants or sexy pants."
"In a lengthy statement on twitter, the supergiant me executive revealed that he had been charged with rape and resolved a sexual harassment charge filed by a female employee."
Sprock also admitted that he was "unfaithful to all my wives and girlfriends."
"When I sit there looking at one hero after another, one man after another, realizing their past indiscretions, I don't sit around and think," who's next? "? "I want to know," when will they come to me? "Sprock wrote."
"The director said the rape charge happened when he was in college."
Although there were no charges or investigations against him, the plaintiff mentioned Spock in an article about the incident, which was read aloud in class
"In my opinion, we've had a drink all night and then returned to my room," he wrote
"We started fooling around, she pushed me away, and then we lay in bed, chatting and laughing, and then we started fooling around again."
"We undressed."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Summer 'vibes': Kim will next release three new fragrances (smelling of cherry, watermelon, and peach) on July 17 through her KKW Beauty brand...”
“Network through 2020 - according to Variety.”
“Kim s latest social media post came after she momager Kris Jenner and her five year old daughter North teamed up to model in Fendi s MeandMyPeekaboo campaign shot by Marcus Hyde which drops this Wednesday Full house Kardashian and her third husband Kanye West who ve been married three...”
“Cherubic child: The Ocean's 8 actress certainly had fun with Snapchat filters - including a golden butterfly halo, purple lipstick, and dog filters'So major to be in a campaign with my mom and daughter!'”
“Chi!'”
“Hi cutie!”
“The 37-year-old mother-of-three - who boasts 203.3M followers - cooed at her five-month-old princess: 'Hey Chi, look at me!”
“...the 38-year-old rapper (born Jayceon Taylor) told TMZ.”
“Kim K for president, you know what I'm saying?'”
“'I say to Kim K, run for president.”


"Summer atmosphere": Kim will release three new fragrances (cherry, watermelon and peach) through its KKW beauty brand in July 17th.
"Network to 2020 - by breed."
"Kim's latest social media post came after her mother, Chris Jenner, and her five-year-old daughter, north, teamed up as models in Marcus Hyde's findy's Mead mypekaboo campaign, which aired a family photo of Kardashian and her third husband, Kanye West, who had been married for three years on Wednesday..."
"Angel child: the 8 actresses of the ocean certainly have the fun of Snapchat filters - including the golden butterfly halo, the purple lipstick, and the dog filter, so important, in the exercise with my mother and daughter!"
"Qi!"
"Hi, cute!"
The 37 year old mother of three, who boasts 203.3 million followers, muttered to the five month old princess, "Hey pool, look at me!"
“…… The 38 year old rapper (born Jason Taylor) told TMZ
Do you know what I'm talking about when Kim is president
"I said to kink," run for president. "



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She said Oosterhouse called her and apologized, saying, “I’m so sorry.”
“...the best and truly hope that she can move forward A year after she left the show Kaminsky told an official at its production company about the allegations...”
“I would have never done anything that I was not sure was mutually agreeable Image zoom Carter Oosterhouse and Amy Smart Credit David Livingston Getty Oosterhouse claimed Kaminsky initiated their relationship the first time including the 15 or so times we had relations thereafter Kaminsky said the demands for oral...”
“In no way did I ever feel, nor was it ever indicated to me, that Kailey was uncomfortable during out intimate relationship.”
“The HGTV star said he “had an intimate relationship with Kailey 9 years ago and it was 100% mutual and consensual.”
“We are in a time of change for society and I am behind it 100%.”Oosterhouse has been married to actress Amy Smart since 2011 and shares 11-month-old daughter Flora with her.”
“In a statement to PEOPLE, the carpenter and TV personality said he is “very passionate about what is happening right now with the #metoo movement, especially because I have so many strong women in my life, like my wife, mother, sister and of course my little baby girl.”
“Then thereafter it was almost every time we would shoot — 10 to 15 times he put me in this position.”Oosterhouse, 41, who also serves as the host of ABC’s The Great Christmas Light Fight, denied anything between him and Kaminsky was not consensual.”
““It was the first time.”
“I was so worn down from his advances, so I did: that day, on that occasion,” she said, admitting she agreed to his demands after he allegedly threatened her employment.”


She said osterhouse called her to apologize and said, "I'm sorry."
“…… Kaminsky told an official of the production company that she sincerely hopes to move forward one year after she left the show. "
"I'll never do anything that I'm not sure both sides agree. In the photo, Carter Osterhaus and Amy Smart Livingston Getty Osterhaus claim that Kaminsky started their relationship for the first time, including our relationship about 15 times since then. Kaminski said that the two sides asked for oral communication.... "
"I never felt or hinted to me that Kelly was uncomfortable in our intimate relationship."
The HGTV star said he "had a close relationship with Kelly nine years ago, which is 100% mutual agreement."
"We are in an era of social change, and I support it 100 percent." Osterhouse has been married to actress Amy Smart since 2011 and shares her 11 month old daughter flora
In a statement to people, the carpenter and television celebrity said he was "very keen on what's going on in the Mayo movement, especially because I have a lot of strong women in my life, such as my wife, mother, sister and, of course, my baby girl."
"Since then, we've filmed almost every time - 10 to 15 times, and he put me in that position." Osterhaus, 41, who is also the host of ABC's "battle of Christmas lights," denies that there is no consensus between him and Kaminski
"This is the first time."
"I was exhausted by his proposal, so I did it: that day, on that occasion," she said She admitted that after he claimed to threaten to hire her, she agreed to his request



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“New episodes will premiere on Friday, June 15.”
“The first season of Queer Eye is currently streaming on Netflix.”
“AJ Brown, who appeared in the fourth episode of the Queer Eye reboot, and his fiancé Andrey are married.”
“During Netflix’s FYSee event on Thursday, May 31, Brown shared the news with the audience, which was then shared on Twitter.”
“The Fab 5 reunited with AJ Andre who revealed they re now MARRIED the official account for Netflix s Queer Eye tweeted on Friday June 1 posting a photo of the show s experts Bobby Berk Karamo Brown Tan France Antoni Porowski and Jonathan Van Ness along with AJ and...”
“Drey...”
“During Brown’s episode, titled “To Gay or Not Too Gay,” he shares his journey of coming out to his family.”
“He’s extremely scared to tell his stepmother, Haide, about being gay, and even more so that he’s dating Drey.”
“However, after a makeover from the Fab Five and a confidence boost, he reveals the news to Haide – who accepts him.”
““I just feel really good about him and I’m thinking about possibly getting married, maybe,” AJ said on the episode.”


The new series will premiere on Friday, June 15
"The first season of strange eye is currently on the air on Netflix."
"Ajie brown, who appeared in the fourth episode of strange eyes, married his fiancee Andre."
"On Thursday, May 31, at Netflix's fysee event, brown shared the news with the audience and then shared it on twitter."
"Fab 5 reunited with AJ Andre. AJ Andre revealed that they are now married. On Friday, June 1, the official account of Netflix," queer eye "tweeted pictures of the program's experts, Bobby Berk karamo Brown Tan France, Antoni porowski and Jonathan Van Ness, as well as AJ...."
"Drey..."
In Brown's episode, entitled "gay or not too gay," he shares his journey out to his family
"He's very afraid to tell his stepmother Hyde that he's gay. What's more, he's dating Drey."
"However, after the transformation of No. 5 plant and the improvement of confidence, he disclosed the news to Hyde, and Hyde accepted him."
"I just feel good about him and I'm thinking about the possibility of getting married, maybe," AJ said on the show



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Sensational']

Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Switch to Latino Español Feedback Help en Choose a language United States English en United States español es Music Reviews Music News Video Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية”
“Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines...”
“...msn back to msn home entertainment powered by Microsoft News Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
At present, in each of 1575 chechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechecheche Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut
"English polskapolski portugal portuguese Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomi Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rk è e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States English American Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ≤ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ P ιιιι P Чхישש㪞ביתاااااالبببببةااا
"Germany - Germany - Spain - France - France - India - English - India - India - India - India - New Zealand - Norway - Norway - Bokmal international version of the ú sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa? Ol Philippines..."
“… MSN return to MSN family entertainment from Microsoft support news jump to navigation jump to content login change language content Africa French French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canada English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spanish Denmark … “



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There ya have it, everything from the most complicated to the easiest pregnant Beyoncé looks.”
“What you'll need:The bigger the better with this one, but if you only have a little time, you can find (or make) a flower crown with stuff at any crafts store.”
“If you want to add an extra little comedic flair to this, I suggest picking up a pair of orthopedic shoes — they'll be hilarious and they'll keep you comfortable all night.”
“A white button-down shirt A pair of black pants A purple sequined blazer A microphone (optional)Obviously, the most important part of this look is the iconic jacket, so any way you can pull that off works.”
“What you'll need:A blonde curly wig (unless you have the hair to pull this off, in which case, more power to you!)”
“Perhaps one of the most legendary moments in VMAs history, this is the look where Bey famously announced she was pregnant with Blue Ivy while performing "Love on Top."”
“Pregnant VMAs BeyoncéKevin WInter/Getty ImagesTake it old school with this one and recreate Beyoncé's 2011 VMAs look.”
“1.”
“Here are some costume ideas to help you pull off a flawless pregnant Bey look this year and have everyone at the party jealous.”
“And, I mean, what better way to honor our nation's royal family than by celebrating the heirs to the royal throne?”


"Well, Beyonce has everything from the most complicated to the easiest to get pregnant."
"What do you need to do: the bigger it is, the better it is, but if you only have a little time, you can find (or make) a corolla with something in any handicraft shop."
"If you want to add a little more comic talent to this, I suggest you buy a pair of orthopedic shoes - they'll be funny and make you comfortable all night."
"A white button shirt, a pair of black pants, a purple Sequin coat and a microphone (optional) obviously, the most important part of this look is the iconic jacket, so any way you can do it is feasible."
"What you need to do: a blonde curly wig (unless you have hair to pull it off, in which case more power for you!)"
"It's probably one of the most legendary moments in Vmas history, when Bei announced that he was pregnant with blue Ivy during his performance" love on top. "
"Kevin winter / Getty pictures of pregnant Vmas infuse it with an old-fashioned flavor and recreate the 2011 Vmas look of Beyonce."
“1.”
"Here are some clothing ideas that can help you create a flawless pregnant shell this year and make everyone at the party envious."
"And, I mean, what better honor for the royal family of our country than to celebrate the heir to the throne?"



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To learn more from our Cosmetologist co-author, like how to blend the bronzer in, keep reading the article!”
“Feather the harsh lines out by dusting over them for radiant skin with a beautiful, subtle glow.”
“Finally, load your brush and apply bronzer to both sides of your nose, leaving a little highlight in the bridge.”
“Feather any harsh lines out and brush downward from the jawline to lightly blend the bronzer into your neck.”
“After you’re done with your cheeks, give your jawline definition by reloading your brush and running it along your jawline.”
“Repeat this on each side, and feather any harsh lines out using the brush.”
“Create contours on your cheeks by brushing in a downward arc from your temple to the corner of your lip.”
“Next, reload your brush and knock off any excess bronzer.”
“Blend the bronzer into the skin under your hairline using small circular motions.”
“Then, run a soft blending brush over the bronzer, and tap the brush to knock off any big pieces.”


"If you want to learn more from our beautician co-author, such as how to integrate bronze color into it, please continue to read this article!"
"Brush the rough lines on it to give the skin a beautiful and delicate luster, so as to remove the rough lines."
"Finally, put on a brush and paint bronze on both sides of the nose, leaving a light spot on the bridge of the nose."
"Grind off the rough lines, brush them down from the chin, and gently apply the bronzed hair to the neck."
"When you run out of your cheek, give your chin line definition, reload your brush and run it along your chin line."
Repeat this step on both sides and brush off the rough lines with a brush
"Draw an arc down from the temple to the corner of the lip and outline the cheek."
"Next, put on the brush again and brush off the extra bronze."
"Mix the bronzes into the skin below the hairline with a small circular motion."
Then, with a soft blend brush on the bronze, tap the brush to remove any large pieces



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Congratulations, Harry!”
“In August, the Duke of Edinburgh attended a parade at Buckingham Palace to mark the Royal Marines 1664 Global Challenge, making it his 22,219th solo official engagement, carried out since 1952.”
“...busy year for the Royals...”
“Getty Images Earlier this year Philip announced his retirement carrying out his final public engagement with the Marines of which he s served in the honourable role since 1953 so it came a fitting closure to the end of a...”
“'She witnessed first hand the pain and suffering of those whose lives and limbs had been destroyed by landmines.'”
“The Prince said: 'Twenty years ago this year, my mother, Diana, Princess of Wales, walked through a cleared minefield in Angola.”
“Receiving the honour, Harry told representatives of 163 states meeting in Vienna for the occasion, that he hopes to see the eradication of landmines throughout the world by 2025.”
“Getty Images'The Queen has been pleased to give her formal approval to the appointment of His Royal Highness Prince Henry of Wales as Captain General Royal Marines,' Buckingham Palace said in a statement.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Congratulations, Harry!"
In August, the Duke of Edinburgh took part in the Royal Marines' 1664 global challenge parade at Buckingham Palace. It was his 22219th official personal contact since 1952
“… A busy year for the royal family... "
"Getty Images earlier this year, Philip announced his retirement. This is his last public contact with the Marine Corps. Since 1953, he has been holding an honorable position in the Marine Corps. Therefore, this is an appropriate end to a..."
"She witnessed the pain and suffering of those whose lives and limbs were destroyed by mines."
"The prince said:" 20 years ago this year, my mother, Diana, Princess of Wales, walked through a minefield cleared in Angola. "
Accepting the honor, Harry told representatives of 163 countries attending the conference in Vienna that he hoped to eliminate mines all over the world by 2025
"The queen is pleased to officially approve the appointment of her Royal Highness Prince Henry of Wales as head of the Royal Marine Corps," Buckingham Palace said in a statement



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You need two people to make a marriage work, and that just wasn’t happening in our relationship.””
““You don’t understand my faith, so of course it’s not going to make sense to you,” 36-year-old McLaughlin, who is a devout Christian, explains.”
“ET) on BravoVicki Gunvalson Says She's 'Off This Damn Show!'”
“...in Explosive (& Tearful) RHOC Reunion TrailerOn the upcoming season 12 reunion, Gunvalson, who has starred on the Bravo reality series since its season 1 premiere in 2006, says that she is “done” with the show — and all of the juicy drama that comes with it.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““F—— a——-,” Gunvalson says in an E!”
“News exclusive trailer as she gets up and walks off the reunion stage.”
“As she enters her dressing room the OG Housewife firmly says I m off this damn show During the explosive reunion Gunvlason 55 tells castmate and former friend Tamra Judge That doesn t look good on you Tamra who proceeds to fire back Nothing looks good on you In addition...”
“...to Gunvalson and Judge s bickering the two part reunion will address the feuds between other cast members including Lydia McLaughlin and Meghan King Edmonds...”
““I’m just trying to say …” says Edmonds, 33, as McLaughlin cuts her off and firmly questions, “What?”


"You need two people to stay married, which is not the case in our relationship."
McLaughlin, 36, a devout Christian, explained: "you don't understand my beliefs, so of course it doesn't make sense to you."
"ET) said on Bravo Vicki gunvalson that she" left the damn show! "
“…… In the upcoming season 12 of reunion, gonwason starred in the Bravo reality series, and since its premiere in the first season of 2006, she said she had "finished" the show - and all the wonderful stories that came with it. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"F -- a --" gonwason uses an e! "
"News Exclusive Trailer, when she stands up and walks out of the reunion stage."
"When she entered the dressing room, the og housewife firmly said that in the explosive reunion, I quit the damned show. Gunvlason 55 told castmate and her ex friend Tamra judge that you don't look good in Tamra. She continued to fight back, saying that you don't look good in Tamra..."
“… For the quarrel between gonwasen and the judge, the reunion of the two parts will solve the grudges between other actors, including Lydia McLaughlin and King Megan Edmonds
"I just want to say..." Edmonds, 33, said McLaughlin interrupted her and asked her firmly, "what?"



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2 PremiereAfter facing some backlash on the comment, Pratt took to Twitter to apologize.”
““Thanks for pointing this out to me.”
“...hard of hearing in a recent Instagram post and found a moving way to say he was sorry...”
“The Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“2 star shared a video in which he apologized in sign language for telling people in a previous post to turn up the volume (Instagram’s default setting is to play the video without noise) rather than use the subtitles.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““When I made a video recently with subtitles, and requested that people turn up the volume and not just ‘read the subtitles’ it was so people wouldn’t scroll past the video on mute, thus watching and digesting the information in the video,” he wrote.”
““HOWEVER, I realize now doing so was incredibly insensitive to the many folks out there who depend on subtitles.”The 37-year-old actor said he didn’t intend to offend the more than 38 million Americans who suffer from hearing loss.”
““I have people in my life who are hearing-impaired, and the last thing in the world I would want to do is offend them or anybody who suffers from hearing loss or any other disability.”
“So truly from the bottom of my heart I apologize,” he wrote.”


"2 Prime Minister Pratt apologized on twitter after strong opposition to the comment."
"Thank you for pointing that out to me."
“… In a recent post on instagram, he heard the sound of hard listening and found a touching way to apologize... "
"Guardian of the galaxy"
"Star 2 shared a video in which he apologized in sign language because in his previous post he told people to turn up the volume (instagram's default setting is to play the video without noise) instead of using subtitles."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Recently I made a video with subtitles, asking people to turn up the volume, not just" read subtitles, "so that people don't scroll through the video in silence, so they can watch and digest the information in the video," he wrote
"However, I realize that this is extremely insensitive to many people who rely on subtitles." The 37 year old actor said he didn't want to offend more than 38 million hearing-impaired Americans
"I have hearing-impaired people in my life, and the last thing I want to do is to offend them or anyone with hearing loss or other disabilities."
"I sincerely apologize to you," he wrote



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Jamie Ducharme at jamie.ducharme@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“The “Shape of You” singer on Saturday posted a photo of himself kissing and embracing Seaborn.”
““Got myself a fiancé just before new year,” he wrote in the caption.”
““We are very happy and in love, and our cats are chuffed as well xx.”Sheeran told People he’s known Seaborn since he was 11, but the couple didn’t start dating until Sheeran invited her to Taylor Swift’s infamous Rhode Island Fourth of July bash in 2015.”
“They’ve been dating ever since, and recently moved in together, People reports.”
“While the couple may have kept the engagement secret for a few weeks, Sheeran has been public about his love for Seaborn.”
“In October, when Radio.com asked the singer if his girlfriend was “the one,” his answer was absolute: “undoubtedly.”Get The Brief.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”


"To Jamie ducham Jamie. Ducham @ time.com. "
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Your shape" singer released a picture of herself kissing and hugging Seaborn on Saturday
"I found myself a fiance just before the new year," he wrote in the title
"We are very happy and love each other, and our cat is very happy." Sheeran told people he had known Seaborn since he was 11, but the couple didn't start dating until Sheeran invited her to Taylor Swift's infamous Rhode Island party on July 4 in 2015
"They've been dating since then and recently moved together," people reported
"While the couple may have kept their engagement secret for weeks, Sheeran has made his love for Seaborn public."
"In October, when the radio network was asked if his girlfriend was" that person, "his answer was absolute:" no doubt. " Listen to me
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
Please enter a valid email address



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Love,” the 53-year-old talk show host responded.”
““I don’t know in a specific day-to-day sense what it is — I don’t know that there is anything.”
“...they decided to finally tie the knot earlier this year and according to the Big Bang Theory actor it was well worth the wait...”
“The four-time Emmy winning actor stopped by The Late Show with Stephen Colberton Thursday where he explained why they waited so long to get married.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We just didn’t care about the act of it that much, to be honest with you,” said Parsons, 44.”
““That sounds cold in a way but I finally thought: ‘Well, let’s have a party then for the celebration and we’ll go ahead and legalize this thing.’ ”The trip down the aisle ended up being much more special than he had anticipated.”
““It was so much more meaningful in the moment for me than I predicted, and it’s been resonantly much more meaningful than for me afterward than I ever saw coming,” he said.”
““You know, I had been an adult gay person for so long at a time where that wasn’t possible where life was ‘fine’ for me.”Parsons and Spiewak, a graphic designer, said their “I dos” in May at the Rainbow Room in New York City.”
““It was fantastic … much more fun than I thought it would be,” he told Extra days later at the CBS upfront presentation.”


"Love," the 53 year old talk show host responded
"I don't know what the specific everyday meaning is - I don't know what it is."
“…… They decided to get married earlier this year, and according to big bang theory, it's worth the wait... "
"The four time Emmy winning actor met Stephen colberton on Thursday's evening show to explain why they had to wait so long to get married."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"To be honest, we just don't care much about this behavior," said Parsons, 44
"It sounds a little cold, but I finally thought," OK, let's have a party to celebrate. We'll legalize it. " The passage journey was much more special than he had expected
"This moment means more to me than I expected, and it means more to me than I saw later," he said
"You know, I've been an adult homosexual for a long time, and life was" wonderful "for me at that time, which was impossible." Parsons and Spivak, a graphic designer, said "I do" at the rainbow hall in New York City in May
"That's great It's much more interesting than I thought, "he said at the CBS premiere



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Production was halted shortly thereafter.”
“Couples Josh Murray and Amanda Stanton broke up in March while Grant Kemp and Lace Morris split last November.”
“And now lovebirds Carly Waddell and Evan Bass are finally exchanging 'I do's.'”
“The reality personas tied the knot this weekend in an intimate ceremony with family and friends in Puerto Vallerta, Mexico according to a Saturday report from Us Weekly.”
“Making it official!”
“Bachelor In Paradise's Carly Waddell and Evan Bass tied the knot in an intimate ceremony this weekend.”
“Above the pair are pictured in a June 15 InstagramSeries host Chris Harrison had the honors of officiating the ceremony while BiP alums Jade Roper and Tanner Tolbert were among the wedding's guests.”
“Carly and Evan are the only couple still going strong from last season of Paradise.”
“Magic moment: Carly and Evan are the only couple from BiP's third season who are still together.”
“Although there were multiple witnesses to the drunken tryst on the first day of filming, a complaint was only filed after a producer raised serious concerns about Corinne's ability to consent after reviewing the footage from the previous day.”


"It stopped production soon after that."
"Josh Murray and Amanda Stanton broke up in March, and grant camp and lace Morris broke up last November."
"Now the couple Carly Waddell and Evan bass have finally exchanged" I do. "
A real-life version of a character's wedding with family and friends was held this weekend in port ballerta, Mexico, US Weekly reported on Saturday
"Officially released!"
Carly Waddell and Evan bass of "the Bachelor of heaven" got married at an intimate ceremony this weekend
"Here's a photo taken on June 15, with host Chris Harrison officiating at the wedding, and BiP alumni jade Roper and Tanner Tolbert as guests."
"Carly and Evan are the only couple still strong in last season's paradise."
"Magic moment: Carly and Evan are the only couple still together in BiP Season 3."
"Although several witnesses witnessed the drunken tryst on the first day of filming, a producer complained after reviewing the previous day's video and raising serious concerns about whether Colleen could agree."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She said of the party: 'It was my birthday, and there were balloons that happened to be pink and blue, and so then, I was pregnant?'”
“Hunk Dakota told Extra It made me giggle so much adding It was such a serious scene and he s so ridiculous looking and quipping He s like wiggling his crazy body around Dakota who in real life is the daughter of Don Johnson and Melanie Griffith and the granddaughter...”
“But when he got shirtless for his new movie Bad Times At The El Royale, his co-star Dakota Johnson found herself unable to contain her laughter.”
“The 29-year-old told Extra: 'It made me giggle so much.”
“It was such a serious scene, and he’s so ridiculous-looking.”
“He’s, like, wiggling his crazy body around.'”
“To tell the truth When Chris Hemsworth got shirtless for his new movie Bad Times At The El Royale his co star Dakota Johnson found herself unable to contain her laughter Chris who rose to fame as the musclebound Norse god Thor in the Marvel Cinematic Universe plays a cult...”
“...chieftain in the 1969 set new movie...”
“The thriller also stars Dakota and Jon Hamm and follows seven strangers converging at a Lake Tahoe hotel and facing their old demons.”
“Lewis Pullman, son of the actor Bill Pullman, joins an impressive cast that includes Tony-winner Cynthia Erivo and Oscar-winner Jeff Bridges.”


"She said of the party: 'it was my birthday. Some balloons happened to be pink and blue. So, am I pregnant?'"
"The handsome guy in Dakota told extra that it made me giggle. It's such a serious scene. He looks so funny. It's like twisting his crazy body around Dakota. In real life, he's the daughter of Don Johnson and Melanie Griffith, and his granddaughter..."
"But when he was topless in the new film bad time from the Royal Academy of fine arts, his partner Dakota Johnson found that he couldn't control his laughter."
"It made me giggle a lot," the 29 year old told the extra
"It's a very serious scene. He looks ridiculous."
"He's, like, wiggling his crazy body."
"To tell you the truth, when Chris Hemsworth was shirtless in El Royal's new film bad time, his partner Dakota Johnson found that he couldn't control his laughter. Chris became famous for playing the muscular Norwegian God Thor in the marvel movie world..."
“… The chief in the new film of 1969... "
"The thriller, starring Dakota and Jon ham, tells the story of seven strangers meeting at the Lake Tahoe hotel to face their old devil."
"Actor bill Pullman's son Lewis Pullman has joined an impressive cast, including Tony Award winner Cynthia erevor and Oscar winner Jeff Bridges."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email InsideLine@tvline.com and your question may be answered via Matt’s Inside Line.”
“Want more scoop on Arrow, or for any other show?”
“Since wrapping his original Arrow run toward the end of Season 3, Haynes’ TV credits have included Scream Queens, The Grinder, a Teen Wolf encore and American Horror Story: Cult.”
“With Haynes now returning solo, should we start worrying about Thea’s fate?”
“The two then left town with Nyssa al Ghul to find and destroy some Lazarus Pits.”
“...happier to return to my role as Roy Harper alongside my Arrow family For Haynes very recent Season 6 encore Roy resurfaced in Star City just as Thea was met with a new threat...”
“While we ve always enjoyed Colton s returns to the show we couldn t be more thrilled to have him return as a proper series regular and we re very excited about all the creative opportunities Roy Harper s return affords us Haynes in turn said I could not be...”
““We’re very fortunate and excited to welcome back Colton to Arrow,” the show’s executive producers said in a statement.”
“Fan favorite Colton Haynes — who just last month reprised his role as Roy Harper, to usher former leading lady Willa Holland off the canvas — is set to return to the superhero drama as a series regular for Season 7.”
“The CW’s Arrow has added a familiar face to its Season 7 arsenal.”


"Email InsideLine@tvline.com Your questions can be answered through Matt's inside
"Want more exclusive news about arrow, or something else?"
Haines completed his original "the quiver" by the end of season 3, and his TV works include "the screaming Queen", "the grinder", "Encore the wolf" and "the American horror story: the cult"
"Haines is back alone now. Should we start worrying about the fate of thea?"
"The two then left the town with Nyssa al Ghul, looking for and destroying some of the Lazarus pits."
“… I'm glad to be back in my role. Roy Harper and my archers are in Haines. In the latest Season 6, encoroy reappeared in Star City, just after thea met a new threat... "
"Although we've always enjoyed Colton's return, we can't be more happy to have him return as a regular regular series guest. We're very excited about all the creative opportunities that Roy Harper's return brings us. Haines, on the other hand, said I can't..."
"We are very lucky and excited to welcome Colton back to arrow," the show's executive producer said in a statement
Fans' favorite, Colton Haynes, just played the role of Roy Harper last month, taking former actress Willa Holland off the stage. He will return to superheroes as a regular series for Season 7
"CW's arrow adds a familiar face to Arsenal in the seventh season



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...sometimes I love you more than you will ever know because you taught me how to love You can watch the original video below for comparison...”
“Like everybody else on the internet Jaden loved the video too and commented Dad this is the funniest thing I ve ever seen in my life you re the best father anyone could ask for thank you for allowing me to express myself even when I take it too far...”
“However, he didn’t forget to add the dad element.”
“And Smith did it with accuracy, too, wearing a chain, denim jacket and fake grills just like Jaden, along with a similar hairdo.”
“What better way can there be to congratulate your son than to parody his video with a “dad” remake?”
“Of courae.”
“Keep Doin’ You!” Along with the congratulatory message, he posted a video in which he made a parody of Jaden’s music video for Icon.”
“He wrote, “It is a delicious gift to a parent to admire his children.”
“After his 19-year-old son Jaden Smith surpassed 100 million streams on Spotify for his debut album Syre, his dad took to Instagram to congratulate him.”
“And it has also won him accolades as a great parent (and internet troll).”


“… Sometimes I love you more than you know, because you taught me how to love. You can watch the original video below for comparison... "
"Just like other people on the Internet, Jaden liked the video and commented that Dad, this is the most interesting thing I have ever seen in my life. You are the best father anyone can ask for. Thank you for allowing me to express myself, even if I have gone too far..."
"However, he didn't forget to add the dad element."
"Smith is also very precise, wearing a chain, a denim jacket, a fake grill like Jaden, and a similar hairstyle."
What better way to congratulate your son than to use a "Dad" remake to imitate his son's video? "
"Of course."
"Go on! "Along with the congratulatory message, he also released a video imitating the music video that Jaden made for icon."
"Admiration for children is a delicious gift for parents," he wrote
"His father came to instagram to congratulate his 19-year-old son, Jaden Smith, on spotify, after his debut album, sire, had more than 100 million hits."
"It also won him the praise of a great parent (and Internet Troll)



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...half-pipe star Mastro told TODAY.”
“Like, 'Oh my God, I'm actually here and doing it!'"”
“Looking like an Olympian, however, takes just a few hours.”
“After proving their ability on the ice or the slopes, athletes must tackle one final hurdle.”
“It’s what Team USA calls “team processing” or what every kid knows as a game of dress-up.”
“TODAY got a close, behind-the-scenes look at the U.S. Olympic wardrobe in Seoul, South Korea, where athletes — including Shaun White and Kelly Clark — dress to impress.”
“Checklist in hand, athletes complete the fitting with the same impressive determination as they practice in sport.”
“For the opening ceremony, athletes geared up in Ralph Lauren parkas and bomber jackets.”
“The all-American brand amped up the tech with heating components embedded in an American flag design on every jacket.”
“For non-Olympians, the coat costs more than $2,000.”


“… Half pipe star mastrow said today
"Like," oh my God, I'm really doing this here! "
"But it looks like an Olympian. It only takes a few hours."
After proving his ability on the ice or slope, the athlete must finish the last hurdle
"That's what the U.S. team calls" team handling, "or the dress up game that every child knows about."
"Today, there was a close behind the scenes display at the U.S. Olympic clothing store in Seoul, South Korea. Athletes including Sean white and Kelly Clark put on impressive clothes."
With the checklists in hand, the athletes finished with the same impressive determination
"For the opening ceremony, the players wore RAF Lauren's parka and baseball uniform."
"The all American brand has embedded heating elements with the American flag on every jacket, which reinforces the technology."
"For non Olympic athletes, the price of this coat is more than $2000."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even Simon - who confessed he was unimpressed with Paige and Artyon the first time he saw them dance - couldn't help but crack a wide smile as they danced their way across the America's Got Talent Stage.”
“Paige and Artyon confessed that they plan to get married when they are older, having been dancing together as best friends for a few years alreadyFlying high!”
“And after their incredible performance on America's Got Talent, nobody could think to put adorable dancers Artyon, eight, and Paige, nine, anywhere but center stage.”
“Even the hard-to-please Simon Cowell couldn't help but be won over by the pair's sensational routine, which saw them performing an incredible series of moves inspired by the hit 1987 movie Dirty Dancing.”
“The time of their lives!”
“Paige eight and Artyon nine wowed the judges on America s Got Talent with their sensational Dirty Dancing inspired moves Moving and grooving The tiny dancers performed an energetic routine to the song The Time of My Life from the...”
“...hit 1987 movie Paige and Artyon even recreated the iconic scene in which Patrick Swayze s character lifts Jennifer Gray high above his head leaving guest judge Heidi Klum s ex husband Seal with his mouth open and prompting a...”
“...loud scream from host Tyra Banks...”
“Indeed the duo made quite the impression on at least some of the judges from the moment they walked out onto the stage with Howie Mandel asking Heidi whether seeing Paige and Artyon was like looking in a mirror thanks...”
“...to their adorable resemblance to herself and ex Seal who interestingly was sat next to his former wife on the panel as a guest judge...”


"Even Simon - who admitted that he didn't remember page and artine when he saw them dancing for the first time - couldn't help laughing because they were dancing on America's got talent stage."
Page and atien said frankly that they plan to get married when they grow up and dance together as best friends for several years. They are already very excited! "
"After their incredible performance on America's got talent, no one can think of putting 8-year-old adorable dancer artine and 9-year-old page anywhere outside the center of the stage."
"Even the hard to please Simon Cowell can't help but be impressed by their sensational performances. They performed a series of incredible actions inspired by the 1987 hit film dirty dance."
"The time of their lives!"
"Page VIII and atien IX made the judges marvel at" America's got talent "with their sensational dirty dance steps and slotting movements. These little dancers performed a set of energetic routines for the song" time in my life... ""
“…… The 1987 hit film "page and atien" even reproduces the role played by Patrick Swayze, holding Jennifer gray high above her head, leaving the seal, the ex husband of visiting judge Heidi Kram, to open his mouth, triggering a "war."
“… The screams of host Tara banks... "
"In fact, from the moment they stepped onto the stage, they left a deep impression on at least some judges. Howie Mandel asked Heidi if he could see page and atien thanking each other like looking in a mirror..."
“…… It's very similar to herself and the former seals. Interestingly, she sits next to the ex-wife of the jury and serves as a visiting judge. "



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post from earlier this year was captioned with Teigen’s thought process for posting a picture and it reflected the struggles of photographing children perfectly.”
“The star often posts pictures on social media that other celebrity parents don’t.”
“Her quick-witted tweets and hilarious captions always seem to entertain her fans.”
“However, in Chrissy’s most recent video, her daughter steals the whole show.”
“Chrissy posted the video to her Instagram to share her daughter’s antics with her 20.5 million followers Thursday night.”
“In the video, mom Chrissy sits on a chair with her two little ones on her lap while another woman (presumably a close friend or family member) sits off to the side.”
“Miles, the baby boy Chrissy Teigen and John Legend welcomed earlier this year, sits quietly as the three ladies around him discuss.”
““Hey guys, welcome to our YouTube channel,” the star jokes.”
“Chrissy is poking fun at the YouTube community where some popular users are known for having more or less the same opening.”
“In the video, Luna becomes argumentative after her mother says her name.”


"The title of a post earlier this year was tagan's thought process of publishing photos, which perfectly reflected his efforts to photograph children."
"The star often publishes photos on social media that other stars' parents don't know about."
"Her witty micro blog and funny subtitles always seem to make her fans happy."
"However, in Chris' latest video, her daughter stole the whole show."
"Chris posted the video on instagram on Thursday night to share her daughter's antics with 20.5 million fans."
"In the video, Kris's mother sits in a chair with two children on her legs, while another woman (possibly a close friend or family member) sits by."
"Earlier this year, Chris tegan and John Legendre welcomed the baby boy miles, who sat quietly, surrounded by three women discussing."
"Hey guys, welcome to our YouTube channel," the stars joked
"Chris is making fun of the YouTube community, where some popular users have more or less the same prologue."
"In the video, Luna becomes argumentative after her mother says her name."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Becoming a mother is the most beautiful thing in the world.”This article originally appeared on Page Six.”
““I finally have my little princess.”
“The model-actress revealed she had her eggs frozen around age 40, shortly after divorcing her fourth husband, Raoul Meyer, and while getting to know her now-fifth hubby, Mattia Dessi, reports People.”
“At the time, a different method was used to freeze eggs, which yielded a lower success rate, adds the magazine.”
“She says doctors gave her only around a 3 to 4 percent chance of having a child using her own eggs.”
““I didn’t have a lot of eggs, but I had enough,” said Nielsen, who has four older sons from previous relationships.”
““I wouldn’t do it later than 42 … [by then] you might only have seven good eggs.”
“Out of those seven, to make them into an embryo?”From there, an embryo had to be implanted.”
“As she described, the IVF process for her was difficult to undergo.”
“For more photos of Nielsen, visit HollywoodLife.com.”


"Being a mother is the most beautiful thing in the world." This article first appeared on page 6
"I finally have my little princess."
According to people magazine, the model actress revealed that her eggs froze shortly after she divorced Raoul Meyer, her fourth husband, at the age of 40, and she now knows her fifth husband, Mattia desi
"At that time, people used another method to freeze eggs, and the success rate was low," the magazine added
"She said the doctors only gave her 3% to 4% chance to have a baby with her own eggs."
"I don't have many eggs, but I've had enough," Nelson said He has four eldest sons, all former lovers
"I'll be no later than 42 You may have only seven good eggs
"Of the seven, are you going to turn them into embryos? "After that, embryos have to be implanted."
"As she describes it, IVF is very difficult for her."
"For more photos of Nelson, please visit Hollywood life."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Garnett Lighting Designer Travis Hagenbuch Origination Los Angeles California Produced By Universal Television Alternative Studio A Smith Co Productions Seven Bucks Productions...”
“They are fighting for the chance to compete on Mount Olympus, Johnson's all-encompassing final obstacle that tests strength, speed, stamina and heart.”
“The 13-episode season from Universal Television Alternative Studio, A. Smith & Co. Productions and Seven Bucks Productions will offer everyday people the once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to compete in epic head-to-head challenges designed to test the mind, body and heart.”
“This season, the competition breaks down into three regional brackets: West, Central and East.”
“Within each region, Dwayne Johnson has selected one male and one female professional athlete to serve as Titans.”
“The preselected Titans are two time Olympic gold medal winning and current undisputed boxing world champion Claressa Shields NFL Iron Man Legend and 10x Pro Bowler Joe Thomas Super Bowl champion Victor Cruz Olympic gold medal winning snowboarder Hannah Teter professional stuntwoman and star American Ninja Warrior Jessie Graff and...”
“...five time UFC champion Tyron Woodley...”
“All have all accepted the challenge to join the competition.”
“During regional competition, we will see two contenders of each gender battle in a best-of-three competition on epic new and fan-favorite obstacles.”
“In order to become a Titan, the competitors will need to defeat one of Johnson's professional Titans and then maintain that position on top of Mount Olympus.”


"Garnett lighting designer Travis hagenbucci originated in Los Angeles, California, produced by universal TV alternative studio a Smith, CO produced for seven dollars..."
"They are fighting for the chance to compete on Olympus, which is Johnson's last obstacle, testing strength, speed, endurance and heart."
Universal television alternative studio, A. Smith& Co.Productions The 13 episode TV season with seven bucks productions will provide a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity for ordinary people to compete in an epic challenge designed to test their body and mind
"This season, the game is divided into three regions: the west, the middle and the East
"In every region, Dwayne Johnson has chosen a male and a female professional athlete to be a giant."
"The two time Olympic gold medalist and now undisputed boxing world champion Clarissa shields, NFL Ironman legend and 10x professional bowler Joe Thomas, Super Bowl champion Victor Cruz, Olympic gold medalist Hannah Tate, professional stuntman and Ninja Warrior star Jesse Graff and..."
“… Five time UFC champion Tyrone Woodley... "
"Everyone accepted the challenge of participating in the competition."
"In regional competitions, we'll see two competitors of each gender play one out of three against epic new hurdles and fans' favorite hurdles."
"In order to be a Titan, competitors have to beat one of Johnson's professional Titans and then maintain that position at Olympus."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's a really happy time for any couple and we wish them all the best and hope they enjoy this happy moment."”
“Following the news on Tuesday, Kate expressed her excitement for the newly engaged couple saying, “William and I are absolutely thrilled.” She continued, “It's such exciting news.”
“Over a year after Prince William’s father revealed that he was planting trees with his grandson Prince George, Kate Middleton also admitted that she is teaching her four-year-old son and daughter Princess Charlotte, two, how to garden.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge made the revelation on Wednesday, November 29, during a visit to London’s Robin Hood Primary School to see its gardening campaign.”
“In a speech, the 35-year-old shared, "I've got such fond memories of being in the garden and being outside from my own childhood, and I'm sharing that with my own children, George and Charlotte, at the moment."”
“CLICK FOR FULL GALLERY VIEW GALLERY The Duchess planted with children during the November 29 engagement Photo Eddie Mulholland WPA Pool Getty Images It s been lovely to meet all of you and thank you so much to all the children who ve shown me what they ve been doing...”
“...in their gardens...”
“It's really inspiring and exciting to see what you've all been up to.”
“I'm really excited about what you're doing here and taking inspiration from that in the school environment as well,” she added.”
“"What you have created here is really so special.”


"It's a very happy moment for any couple. We wish them all the best and hope they can enjoy it."
After Tuesday's news, Kate expressed her excitement about the newly engaged couple, saying: "William and I are really excited." She went on, "it's exciting news."
"After William's father revealed that she was planting trees with her grandson Prince George for more than a year, Kate Middleton admitted that she was teaching her 4-year-old son and 2-year-old Princess Charlotte how to plant trees."
The Duchess of Cambridge revealed the news on Wednesday, November 29, when she visited a horticultural activity at Robin Hood primary school in London
In a speech, the 35 year old shared: "I've been in the garden since I was a child. It's my best memory. I'm now sharing it with my children, George and Charlotte."
"Click to go to the full gallery to see the pictures of the Duchess of gallery growing with her children during her engagement on November 29. It's nice to meet all of you. Thank you so much for showing me what they've been doing..."
“… In their garden... "
"It's exciting and exciting to see what you're all doing."
"I'm really excited about what you're doing here and getting inspiration from it, as well as in the school environment," she added
"What you create here is so special."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“!”
“HollywoodLifers, aren’t you mega jealous of Beyonce’s babymoon in Bora Bora?”
“Before welcoming two babies into the world, Beyonce and hubby Jay Z jetted off to a private island in Bora Bora for a super romantic babymoon!”
“Read all about their exotic vacation, here!”
“Honeymoons are SO 2016!”
“This year is all about babymoons, and Beyonce, 35, is living proof of that!”
“The expectant singer, who is currently missing out on Coachella where she was supposed to perform, is enjoying some serious R&R in Bora Bora with her husband, Jay Z, 47.”
“Oh, and did we mention they’re reportedly chilling on a PRIVATE ISLAND in Tahiti?”
“The stars are taking it easy on their “low-key” vacation before Beyonce gives birth to her twins, according to the Daily Mail.”
“Life is like a dream come true for the married couple, and the best part hasn’t even happened yet.”


“!”
"Holly worms, don't you envy Beyonce's baby son at Bora?"
"Before welcoming the two babies to the world, Beyonce and her husband jay z flew to a private island in Bora Bora to enjoy a super romantic crib!"
"Look at their exotic vacation, here!"
"What a wonderful honeymoon
"This year is all about babies. Beyonce, 35, is a living proof!"
"The expectant singer is missing out on where she should be performing in cochella, where she is enjoying some serious R & R activities with her 47 year old husband jay z in Bora Bora."
"Oh, did we mention that they were on a private island in Tahiti?"
Before Beyonce gave birth to twins, the stars were taking a "low-key" vacation, the Daily Mail reported
"For married couples, life is like a dream come true. The best part hasn't even happened yet."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can read more about it and their mission on their site.”
“The Invictus Games "is an international sporting event for wounded, injured and sick Servicemen and women, both serving and veterans."”
“However, unfortunately it doesn't look like Prince Harry had any popcorn to share with Obama and Biden.”
“Karwai Tang/WireImageObama was just at the Presidents Cup with George W. Bush and Bill Clinton the day before this, so he has had a pretty awesome week of sports events.”
“Chris Jackson/Getty Images for the Invictus Games FoundationAnd it looks like they had a great time cheering on the athletes too.”
“They had lots of fans.”
“Alysha TsujiUSA TODAYFormer president and vice president Barack Obama and Joe Biden went to the Invictus Games in Toronto on Friday, and they got to hang out with Prince Harry while watching wheelchair basketball.”


"You can learn more about it and their mission on their website."
"Inviolable Games" is an international sports event for injured, injured and sick men and women, including servicemen and veterans
"Unfortunately, however, Prince Harry doesn't seem to have popcorn to share with Obama and Biden."
"The day before yesterday, Obama just participated in the Presidential Cup with Bush and Clinton, so his sports events this week are quite wonderful."
"Chris Jackson / Getty's photos of the inviolable games foundation seem to have cheered the athletes as well."
"They have a lot of fans."
Eliza tsujuusa today, former president and Vice President Barack Obama and Joe Biden went to the inviolable games in Toronto on Friday to watch wheelchair basketball with Prince Harry



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She and I grew up 20 minutes away from each other but never met until we met in LA.””
“I believed in love until Chris Pratt and Anna Faris separated.”
““Anna and I are sad to announce we are legally separating.”
“We tried hard for a long time, and we’re really disappointed.”
“Our son has two parents who love him very much and for his sake we want to keep this situation as private as possible moving forward,” Pratt posted on his Facebook page.”
“Pratt’s publicist confirmed the separation to CNN.”
““We still have love for each other, will always cherish our time together and continue to have the deepest respect for one another.”A similar statement was tweeted from Faris’ verified account late Sunday night.”
“The couple has been married for eight years.”
“They have one child together.”
“The news came as a shock to fans who have long adored the love story of the “Guardians of the Galaxy” star and his “House Bunny” star wife.”


"She and I grew up 20 minutes apart, but we didn't know each other until we met in Los Angeles."
"I believed in love until Chris Platt and Anna Faris separated."
"Anna and I are sad to announce that we will be legally separated."
"We worked hard for a long time and we were really disappointed."
"Our son has two parents who love him very much, and for his sake, we hope that this will not happen in the future as much as possible," Platt wrote on his Facebook
"Pratt's PR staff confirmed the separation to CNN."
"We still love each other, will always cherish our time together, and continue to have the deepest respect for each other." Late Sunday night, Faris's verification account tweeted a similar statement
"The couple have been married for eight years."
"They had a baby together."
"The news has surprised fans who have long admired the love story between the guardian of the Galaxy star and his wife, the rabbit star."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel for fun, exclusive videos with your favorite stars.”
“Love J-14?”
“That's a fact.”
“From bringing to life the one and only Troy Bolton in the High School Musical movies to playing Link in the 2007 movie version of Hairspray to now starring in The Greatest Showman Zac knows his way around a song...”
“...and dance...”
“Or so we thought.”
“Basically, Zac just went ahead and crushed us all by admitting that the musical life as much as he loves it, actually doesn't come all that naturally to him.”
“WILD.”
“In an interview with the Los Angeles Times along with his co star the queen that is Zendaya Zac pointed out that since it s been 10 years he was back in his musical roots he wasn t all that...”
“...confident in his abilities to pull it off again...”


"Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel and watch interesting exclusive videos with your favorite stars."
"Love j-14?"
"It's true."
"From playing the only Troy Bolton in a high school musical, to playing link in the 2007 film version of hairspray, to starring Zach, the greatest performer, who knows a song like the back of his hand..."
“… Dance... "
"At least that's what we think."
"Basically, Zach just admitted that he loved music life, but the fact that he didn't accept music life so naturally made us all collapse."
"Wild."
"In an interview with the Los Angeles Times, his co star, Queen zendaya Zac, pointed out that since he returned to the roots of music 10 years ago, he has not been completely..."
“… Confident in his ability to succeed again... "



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Drop a comment below.”
“How do you find their Lopez and Rodriguez’s Parisian trip?”
“Lopez and Rodriguez spent the weekend in the most romantic city in the world, Paris.”
“The couple was photographed in a yacht and was spotted enjoying romantic walks in the street.”
“And the two apparently blew an exorbitant amount while on their Parisian getaway, which reportedly cost an estimated total of $358,129, according to E!”
“News.”
“READ: Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are already talking about marriageHere’s a breakdown of Lopez and A-Rod’s expensive tour.”
“Flying from Miami to Nice via Private Fly Long Range Jet reportedly cost the two $81,580.”
“Flying from Nice to Paris via private jet is about $9,190.”
“If they flew from Paris back to Los Angeles via Private Fly Long Range Jet, it would cost them $94,450.”


"Comment below."
"What do you think of their trip to Paris by Lopez and Rodriguez?"
Lopez and Rodriguez spend the weekend in Paris, the most romantic city in the world
"The couple were photographed on a yacht and taking a romantic walk in the street."
The two apparently blew too much smoke during their holiday in Paris, according to e! "
"News."
"Read: Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are already talking about getting married, and Lopez and A-Rod's expensive tour has broken down."
"It is reported that the cost of flying from Miami to nice by private long-range plane is $81580."
"It costs about $9190 to fly from nice to Paris by private jet."
"If they take a private long-distance flight from Paris back to Los Angeles, it will cost $94450."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll on to see and shop the look for yourself!”
“All in all, she made some very smart choices to help her pull off both trends at once.”
“Plus, Hadid chose to pair her double-denim look with a crop top and Givenchy heeled booties, ensuring her figure didn't get lost in the oversize silhouettes.”
“Opting for a Canadian tuxedo in the first place is stylish in and of itself, but adding in a more fashion-forward denim shape pushes the limits in the best way possible.”
“The model was spotted this week in a light-wash Misbhv jacket and similarly washed wide-leg jeans with just a hint of a flare.”
“For those looking to do so, or for anyone who avoids skinny jeans in the first place, Bella Hadid's latest look is for you.”
“But every now and then, we want to challenge you to step outside your comfort zone a little bit and try something new.”
“After being majorly on trend for some time, they just stuck around and became a classic staple to own.”
“For many women, skinny jeans are the go-to denim pant silhouette.”


"Continue scrolling and buy the look yourself!"
"In short, she made some very smart choices to help her achieve both trends at the same time."
"In addition, Hadid also chose a pair of jeans with a jacket and Givenchy high-heeled boots to ensure that her figure will not be lost in the oversized silhouette."
"It's fashionable to choose Canadian tuxedo first, but with more fashionable and avant-garde jeans, it pushes the limit in the best way."
"This week, the model was found wearing a light washed misbhv jacket and wide leg jeans that were also washed, with only a glimmer of light."
"For those who want to do it, or for those who avoid skinny jeans in the first place, Bella Hadid's latest look suits you."
"But from time to time we want to challenge you to get out of your comfort zone and try something new."
"After a period of popularity, they have been popular and become a classic staple food."
"For many women, skinny jeans are the most popular style of jeans."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“"Say 'ichka' at the end of every word to make it cute.”
“She tells ET that before Jenna becomes a Chmerkovskiy, she should learn the following things:1.”
“Of course, coming into a Russian family that big can be a bit intimidating, but Peta already has three no-fail tips for her future sister-in-law!”
“"I came from a pretty small one that was scattered all over the world, so to come into a Russian household like this one -- I sort of just claimed about 50 family members, so it's great."”
“"I've always wanted to have a big family," Peta explained.”
“The DWTS pro popped the question in June, and Maks and Peta couldn't be more stoked about officially welcoming Jenna into the family.”
“It's an extra exciting time for the Chmerkovskiys, as Maks' brother, Val, is currently planning a wedding with his fiancée, Jenna Johnson.”
“4!"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Say 'ichka' at the end of each word to make it cute."
She told et that before Jenna becomes chimmerkovsky, she should learn the following things: 1
"Of course, it may be scary to come to such a big Russian family, but PETA has prepared three secrets for her future sister-in-law that can't be defeated!"
"I come from a fairly small family scattered around the world, so I come to a Russian family like this - I only claim about 50 family members, so it's good."
"I always wanted to have a big family," PETA explained
"DWTS professionals raised this issue in June, and mark and PETA are happy to officially welcome Jenna into the family."
"It's a particularly exciting time for the chimmelkovsky couple, because Mark's brother Val is planning a wedding with his fiancee Jenna Johnson."
“4!"”



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The episode will likely leave members of the Royal Household deeply concerned about security ahead of the Royal wedding on May 19th, with the couple due to make several public appearances before then.”
“Tests confirmed that the powder was harmless, with the couple informed about what had happened.”
“The letter was opened by a member of staff and intercepted before it reached the Prince and Ms Markle, with specialist officers called in to investigate.”
“Police are investigating the suspect package, treating it as a "racist hate crime", after it was sent to St James’ Palace last week.”
“The Royal Family has been caught up in an anthrax scare after a racist poison pen letter containing white powder was allegedly posted to Prince Harry and Meghan Markle.”


"This episode may make members of the royal family deeply worried about their safety before the royal wedding on May 19, when the couple will make several public appearances."
"Tests confirmed that the powder was harmless, and the couple learned what happened."
"The letter was opened by a staff member and was intercepted before it reached the prince and Ms. markel, and the special officials were called in to investigate."
Police are investigating the suspect's package, which was sent to St. James' Palace last week as a "crime of racial hatred."
"It is said that after a racist poison pen letter containing white powder was pasted on Prince Harry and Megan marcel, the royal family fell into anthrax panic."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— Jamie Denbo (@jamiedenbo) May 8, 2017”
“Denbo shot back at her critics on Monday with yet another tweet.”
““I was just informed that at the age of 43, I am TOO OLD to play the wife of a 57 year old,” Denbo, who plays a Jewish inmate at Litchfield Penitentiary named Ginsberg on the Netflix series, wrote in a series of tweets.”
““The real wife of the 57 year-old actor is EASILY AT LEAST 50.”
“But this fucker wants to be tv married to a 38 year-old -TOPS.”Though she declined to reveal the identity of the male actor or to specify which project she was talking about, she did note that the two characters have an 18-year-old daughter in the script.”
“Also Read: Zoe Saldana Says Sexism Is 'Much More Aggressive' Than Racism in America (Video)“Old white men, enjoy your last run.”
“We are all fucking done with you lizards,” Denbo wrote last week.”
“Denbo’s story is similar to one shared by Maggie Gyllenhaal in an interview with TheWrap in 2015.”
“Gyllenhaal described having been, at the age of 37, deemed too old to play the love interest of a 55-year-old man.”
““There are things that are really disappointing about being an actress in Hollywood that surprise me all the time,” she said.”


"- Jamie Denbo (@ jamiedenbo) May 8, 2017"
"Danbo sent another micro blog on Monday to attack her critics."
"I just learned that when I was 43, I was too old to play the wife of a 57 year old man," Deng Bo, who plays a Jewish prisoner, Ginsberg, in the Netflix series
"The 57 year old actor's real wife is at least 50 years old."
"But this bastard wants to marry a 38 year old top on TV." Although she declined to identify the actor and did not specify which project she was talking about, she did notice that the two characters had an 18-year-old daughter in the script
Read also: Zoe Saldana says sexism is more aggressive than racism in the United States (video) "old white man, enjoy your last run."
"We're all fed up with you goddamn lizards," Denbo wrote last week
"Denbo's story is similar to the one Maggie Gyllenhaal shared with the wrap in 2015."
At 37, Gyllenhaal said, he was considered too old to be as interested in love as a 55 year old man
"It's really disappointing to be an actor in Hollywood, which has always surprised me," she said



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related articles...”
“Princess Charlotte and Prince George will be flower girl and page boy.”
“Princess Kate and delighted dad Prince William took their new arrival home from hospital on Monday night.”
“The royal bundle, who weighed 8lb 7oz, is settling in at Kensington Palace with his brother George, four, and two-year-old sister Charlotte.”
“Doting Prince Charles said: “It is a great joy to have another grandchild.”
““The only trouble is I don’t know how I am going to keep up with them.”Princess Kate is now torn over whether to take her new baby to Prince Harry’s wedding to Meghan Markle on May 19.”
“Insiders fear there is a risk it could overshadow the Suits star’s big day.”
“The guests’ attention could be divided on catching another glimpse of the tiny prince as well as the bride.”
“PAPrincess Charlotte and Prince George have important roles to play in the Royal WeddingWith husband Wills being best man, Kate will have to make sure the young children perform their duties.”
“And the fourth prime-time special is scheduled to be Prince Harry’s Story: Four Royal Weddings.”


"Related articles..."
"Princess Charlotte and Prince George will be flower boys and paging boys."
"Princess Kate and happy father Prince William took their new love home from the hospital on Monday night."
"This royal bundle weighs eight pounds and seven ounces and is settled in Kensington Palace with his four-year-old brother George and his two-year-old sister Charlotte."
The doting Prince Charles said: "it's a great pleasure to have another grandson."
"The only problem is I don't know how to keep up with them." Kate is now struggling to bring her new baby to Prince Harry's wedding to Megan markel on May 19
"People in the industry are worried that this may cast a shadow on the wedding day of the suit stars."
"Guests may be distracted by a glimpse of the little prince and bride again."
"Charlotte and Prince George play an important role in the royal wedding. Her husband's will is the best man, and Kate must ensure that the young children perform their duties."
"The fourth prime time special is the story of Prince Harry: four royal weddings."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET) on ABC.”
“I couldn’t thank her enough.”The season 25 Dancing with the Stars finale airs Tuesday (9 p.m.”
“...head judge Len Goodman said on Monday night's episode'War on the Floor': Drew Scott Is Eliminated from DWTS as He's Dubbed 'Most Improved Dancer'Drew Scott‘s time on Dancing with the Stars has come to an end.”
“On night one of the season 25 finals, Scott was sent home on Monday evening after delivering his two final dances with pro partner Emma Slater.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoomScott, 39, was the first celebrity contestant to kick off the night with his Paso Doble, for which he was awarded a 36/40 by Carrie Ann Inaba, Len Goodman, Bruno Tonioli and returning guest judge Julianne Hough.”
“When Scott hit the floor for his second number of the night — a freestyle — he wowed judges with his improvements and earned a near perfect score: 39/40.”
““If you could recall back to week one, I said if you were a house, you’d be a fixer upper.”
“Well let me tell you on that performance the house is fixed and you ve become a hot commodity Goodman remarked of the Property Brothers star who the head judge dubbed the most improved dancer on this show Despite earning solid scores Scott s three fellow contestants came out strong...”
“...and earned higher overall scores 76 80 for Frankie Muniz 80 80 for Jordan Fisher and 80 80 for Lindsey Stirling...”


"ET) on ABC."
"I can't thank her enough." The final episode of season 25 dance with the stars will air on Tuesday (9 p.m.)
“…… Chief justice Ron Goodman said in Monday night's "war on the floor," that druckett was eliminated because he was known as "the best dancer.". It's the end of the time when drewcott dances with the stars. "
"On the first night of the season 25 finals, Scott was sent home on Monday night after performing his last two dances with professional partner Emma Slater
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Image zoom Scott, 39, was the first celebrity player to open with his paso doble, for which he won 36 / 40 points from Carrie Ann Inaba, len Goodman, Bruno tonioli and the returning visiting judge Julianne Hough."
"When Scott played in the second number freestyle game in the evening, his progress surprised the judges and got a near perfect score: 39 / 40."
"If you can recall the first week, I said that if you are a house, you are a repairman."
"Well, let me tell you, in that show, the house was repaired and you became a hot commodity. Goodman said of the real estate brother star that although Scott's three contestants got high marks, the chief judge still called him the fastest-growing dancer in the show..."
“…… Frankie Muniz's total score is higher, Jordan Fisher's total score is 7680, Lindsay Stirling's total score is 8080.... "



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Images: Nickelodeon; The Anime Network (2); f**kyeahseanoneal/Tumblr...”
“Development HellO'Neal appeared as a background actor on this 2013 web series about a production company.”
“Full House is getting a spinoff series, Boy Meets World has a reincarnation in Disney Channel's Girl Meets World, and even the Magic School Bus is chugging back onto TV.”
“So why not bring back Clarissa Explains It All?”
“After all, the series launched Melissa Joan Hart's career AND provided us with endless hours of family-friendly entertainment, all told through the perspective of a savvy, colorfully dressed tween.”
“We know where Hart is today she s back polishing off yet another sitcom with Melissa Joey and will probably make a plethora of ABC Family TV movies in the near future but she s not the only person I”
“...want to keep track of post Clarissa Explains It All...”
“Whatever happened to Sam, aka actor Sean O'Neal?”
“I always wanted a BFF like Sam, if only because his mode of transportation (a ladder into Clarissa's bedroom window) always seemed pretty rad.”
“The actor who played him, O'Neal, was in his early teens while on the show, and now is a full-fledged adult.”


"Picture: Nickelodeon; animation network (2); f * * kyeahseanoneal / Tumblr..."
"Develop hello'neal as a background actor in this 2013 online series about a production company."
Full house is on a spin off, boys and the world is reincarnated in Disney Channel's girls and the world, and even the magic school bus is crunching back on TV
"Then why not bring Clarissa back?" She explained
"After all, the series started Melissa Joan Hart's career and provided us with endless family entertainment time, all from the perspective of a smart, colorful young man."
"We know where Hart is today. She and Melissa joy have made another sitcom. It's likely that she will make a lot of ABC Family TV movies in the near future, but she's not the only one I like."
“… After trying to follow Clarissa, explain everything... "
"Sam, also known as actor Sean O'Neill, what's the matter?"
"I've always wanted a good friend like Sam, even if it's just because his mode of transportation (a ladder to Clarissa's bedroom window) always looks fashionable."
"O'Neill, the actor who played him, was only a teenager in the play and is now a mature adult."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 35-year-old royal may have revealed the gender of his and Kate Middleton's third child while celebrating his soccer team's championship win on Tuesday night.”
“William got a little caught up in the excitement after Aston Villa player Jack Grealish's winning goal against their rivals, Cardiff City, telling fans, "I'm going to insist the baby is called Jack," The Mirror reports, adding after a pause, "or Jackie."”
“Prince William Reveals Children Charlotte and George's Favorite Pastimes!”
“This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Embed Code Restart Prince William Reveals Children Charlotte and George's Favorite Pastimes!”
“William and Kate have yet to reveal the name they've picked out for baby No.”
“3 -- or whether it's a girl or boy.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 35 year old royal may have revealed the gender of his third child with Kate Middleton when celebrating his football team's victory on Tuesday night."
"After Aston Villa player Jack grayish scored the winning goal against Cardiff City, William was a little excited and said to the fans," I insist that the child's name is Jack, "the mirror reported, adding after a pause," or Jackie. "
Prince William showed the children Charlotte and George's favorite pastime
"This video is not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's email."
Prince William showed the children Charlotte and George's favorite pastime
"William and Kate haven't disclosed the name they named for the baby yet."
"3 - either a girl or a boy."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Asking them to first corroborate or first give proof or first make sure we're not misremembering or first consider the consequences of speaking out or first let men give their side or first just let your sanity come last.”
“The nation's harmful narrative of disbelieving women first, above all else.”
“You tried to make it sound innocent.”
“"It's such a great place, have you ever been?"”
“At one point you suggested we should all go to Las Vegas together.”
“Upon leaving the restaurant we were stopped by you and your friend, who both seemed very nice.”
“I had just gotten my driver's license and very specifically remember my nervousness trying to park in the diner parking lot.”
“We decided to go to Mel's diner on Sunset Boulevard in Hollywood to get burgers after.”
“My friend Billy and I were at the Roxy on Sunset Boulevard seeing a band we loved.”
“I see your gaslight and now will raise you a scorched earth.”


"Let them prove it first, or provide evidence first, or make sure we remember correctly, or consider the consequences first, or let men stand by them first, or let your reason come last."
"This country doesn't believe in the harmful idea of feminism."
"You want this to sound innocent."
"Have you ever been to such a good place?"
"Once you suggested that we go to Las Vegas together."
"When we left the restaurant, we were stopped by you and your friends. They all looked good."
"I just got my driver's license, and I remember clearly how nervous I was when I was parking in the dining car parking lot."
"We decided to eat hamburgers at Mel's on Sunset Boulevard in Hollywood."
"My friend Billy and I saw a band we liked at Roxy on Sunset Boulevard."
"I saw your gas lamp, and now I'm going to scorch you."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I don’t get angry anymore unless I’m really, really hurt — so this is the end result of me being angry, is that I’m hurt.””
““Not cool.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Everything that’s going on with Jen is just driving me crazy,” he said.”
““They say if things aren’t good at home, then things aren’t going to be good in life.”
“Me and Jen, we’re going to be involved in each other’s lives forever, so we may be toxic forever.”But beyond repairing his relationship with Jen, Ronnie’s focus was on the couple’s infant daughter, Ariana Sky.”
“Determined to get a custody plan in place, he paid a visit to his lawyer’s office to get the paperwork in motion.”
““I have to make a change for my daughter.”
“I have to put a stop to this for Ariana, something has to be done so she has stability and foundation,” he said.”
““That’s why we need some kind of guidelines, to make sure that she’s all right at the end of the day.”And the rest of the cast was more than happy to give Ronnie his time and space.”


"I won't get angry again unless I'm really, really hurt - so that's the end result of my anger, that's when I get hurt."
"Not cool."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Everything about Jane is driving me crazy," he said
"They say that if things at home are bad, things in life will not be good."
"Jennie and I, we will always be involved in each other's lives, so we may always be toxic." But in addition to repairing his relationship with Jennie, Ronnie's attention is also focused on the couple's youngest daughter, Arianna Skye
Determined to make a guardianship plan, he went to a law firm to start the paperwork
"I have to make a change for my daughter."
"I have to stop this for Ariana, I have to do something, so she has stability and foundation." He said.
"That's why we need some guidelines to make sure she's OK at the end of the day." The rest of the crew are very happy to give Ronnie time and space. "



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“EntertainmentRead next The chicest nail art designs to try at home Nail Art The chicest nail art designs to try at home From alternative Frenchies to statement cuticles.”
“Youtube / E!”
“...goodbye Advertisement When asked if she found it difficult to carry another couple s baby she explained I like being pregnant...”
“As campaigners call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say goodbye Pregnancy As campaigners call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say...”
“Read next Here's a healthy pancake recipe that makes for a delicious at-home breakfast or dessert Food Here's a healthy pancake recipe that makes for a delicious at-home breakfast or dessert Delish.”
“It's already a big deal."”
“It's amazing.”
“"Like, with all the women who do have pregnancy issues, that put so much trust in people like me.”
“I'm so proud of doing it in general.”
“Kris thanked La'Reina for the gesture, to which she responded:"Thank you.”


"Read the following most unique nail art design for entertainment try the nail art at home try the most unique nail art design from the French to the cuticle at home."
“Youtube/E！”
“… When asked if it was difficult to conceive another couple's child, she explained, "I like to be pregnant..."
"When the candidates called for the reform of the surrogacy law, a woman disclosed her true feelings of having another woman's child and saying goodbye to pregnancy; when the candidates called for the reform of the surrogacy law, a woman disclosed that she was pregnant with another woman's child and said..."
"Read the next page. Here's a healthy pancake recipe for a delicious family breakfast or dessert. Here's a healthy pancake recipe for a delicious family breakfast or dessert."
"It's a big deal."
"It's amazing."
"Like, all women have pregnancy problems, which makes people like me very trusting."
"On the whole, I'm proud to be able to do that."
Chris appreciated larena's gesture, and she replied, "thank you."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more Akins family updates keep up with Country Fancast!”
“From Willa Gray’s first birthday with her family to Christmas as a family of four, they’ve done it all and with big smiles on their faces!”
“More here!”
“Life just one year ago was a lot different for country music star Thomas Rhett and his wife Lauren Akins.”
“The couple had no children— but that was all about to change when they would welcome their first daughter, Willa Gray, home from Uganda in May.”
“Having children is something the couple has dreamed about and asked God for and now that their dreams are coming true they take every minute to gush about their two bundles of joy.”
“On the 2018 Grammy Awards Red Carpet the two couldn’t stop talking about their girls with E!”
“News!”
“Thomas Rhett said that it has been “amazing” to watch Willa be a big sister to newborn Ada James.”
““She was jealous at first I think, but it’s so fun to watch her,” Thomas Rhett said.”


"To learn more about Akins family updates, please keep in touch with country fancast!"
"From Vera gray and her family's first birthday to Christmas of the family of four, they all did it with a big smile on their face!"
"More!"
"Just a year ago, the lives of country music star Thomas reed and his wife Lauren Akins were very different."
"The couple have no children - but that's going to change, and they're going to welcome their first daughter, Vera gray, home from Uganda in May."
"Having a baby is a dream of the couple. Now their dream has come true. They are talking about their two great joys every minute."
"On the red carpet of the 2018 Grammy Awards ceremony, they can't help talking about themselves and E!"
"News!"
Thomas Reed said it was "amazing" to see Vera become the eldest sister of ADA James
"I think she was jealous at first, but it's fun to look at her," Thomas Reed said



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...revealed in the caption of a snap of the set...”
“Fans can pick up the Glam Bible Smokey Volume I collection for $150 as the E!”
“The mother-of-three took to Instagram to share a sweet moment between her husband and their youngest child, nine-month-old Chicago.”
“In the image, the chubby cheeked baby looked off into the distance as her 41-year-old-father planted a smooch on her head.”
“Daddy daughter time: Kim Kardashian shared a sweet moment with husband Kanye West planting a kiss on their nine-month-old daughters head in an Instagram post on TuesdayThe 38-year-old reality star captioned the image with no words and just a simple happy emoji.”
“The last few days have been a trying time for the Kardashian-West family.”
“Kanye took to Twitter on Monday night to announce that he is delaying the release of his forthcoming ninth studio album, Yandhi.”
“The album was originally slated for release on at the end of September but was delayed following the rapper's controversial appearance on Saturday Night Live.”
“Wait and see: Kanye announced on Monday that he would be delaying his Yandhi album a second timeThen, Kim took to Twitter to tell fans they could expect Yandhi on November 23 but now it looks like the album will be in limbo for the time being.”
“'It felt so good being on the stage last night with my brother Cudi,' Yeezy wrote on social media Monday.”


“… Show in title of set shot... "
"Fans can buy" dazzling Bible "smoke volume I series for $150 as e!"
"The mother of three shared a sweet moment on instagram between her husband and their youngest child, 9-month-old Chicago."
"In this picture, when her 41 year old father kisses her on the head, the chubby face looks into the distance."
"Father daughter era: Kim Kardashian shared a sweet moment with her husband Kanye West on instagram on Tuesday, kissing his 9-month-old daughter on the head. The 38 year old reality star has no words in the title of the picture, just a simple happy expression
"The past few days have been a difficult time for the Kardashian West family."
On Monday night, Kanye announced on twitter that he had delayed the release of his upcoming ninth album, yandhi
"The album was originally planned to be released at the end of September, but it was delayed after the rapper's controversial debut on Saturday night's live broadcast."
"Wait and see: on Monday, Kanye announced that he would postpone his yandhi album for a second time, and then Kim told fans on twitter that they could expect yandhi to be released on November 23, but now it seems that the album has not been finalized yet."
"It was great to be on stage with my brother Kudi last night," he wrote on social media on Monday



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Oh that s a great idea and ran in and said George wants us to do this Solo A Star Wars Story opens on May 25 2018”
“There s even one little moment in a scene that I can t tell you what sorry but in the scene on the Millennium Falcon where George said Why doesn t Han just do this Ron happened to be by the monitor and not inside the Falcon and he goes...”
“We normally aren’t fans of the phrase ‘creative differences’ but for once this cliché is true.”
“Just getting it done.”This squares with the statement Lord and Miller released after they left the production:“Unfortunately, our vision and process weren’t aligned with our partners on this project.”
“So, it literally came down to process.”
“...inside of a highly structured process or you can t get the work done and you can t move the armies of people to anticipate and have things ready...”
“Kathleen Kennedy explains I think these guys are hilarious but they come from a background of animation and sketch comedy and when you are making these movies you can do that and there s plenty of room for improvisation we do that all the time but it has to be...”
“Improvisation isn’t discouraged in the Star Wars franchise, yet Lord and Miller’s approach was allegedly slowing things down.”
“The filmmakers were open to improvisation.”
“Per the EW piece, Lord and Miller took an experimental approach to Solo: A Star Wars Story.”


"Oh, that's a good idea. He came in and said that George wanted us to play the movie star wars alone. The story will be released on May 25, 2018."
"In one scene, I can't even tell you what I'm sorry, but in the Millennium Falcon scene, George said why han didn't do this. Ron happened to be next to the monitor, not in the Falcon, and he left..."
"We don't usually like the phrase 'creative difference', but this time it's true."
"Just finished." This is consistent with the statement made by Lord and Miller after they left production: "unfortunately, our vision and process are not consistent with our partners on this project."
"So, this is actually the process."
“… In a highly structured process, or you can't get the job done, you can't mobilize people in the army to predict and prepare things... "
"Kathleen Kennedy explained that I think these people are funny, but they come from the background of animation and comedy sketches. When you make these movies, you can do that, and there's enough room for improvisation. We always do that, but it has to be..."
"Improvisation wasn't hindered in the Star Wars series, but it's said that Lord and Miller slowed things down."
"Filmmakers are open to improvisation."
According to EW, Lord and Miller took an experimental approach to solo: the story of Star Wars



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The best solution is drinking tons of water, getting a lot of sleep, and keeping the under-eye area hydrated!”
“How to wave goodbye to bagsDark circles are often hereditary.”
“To combat dry skin in the winter, you could add in a hyaluronic acid to help your skin hold on to moisture.”
“Tackle seasonal skincare problemsIf you’re using the right products for your skin type, you shouldn’t have to switch up your products as the seasons change.”
“3.”
“Blue LED light kills acne causing bacteria and reduces inflammation!”
“If you’re experiencing a breakout before an event, you could get an LED Light Treatment or use a blue LED light at home.”
“How to fix redness instantlyThe best thing to do to treat red, inflamed skin, is to stay away from products with a high amount of actives and instead stick to hydrating, soothing products.”
“2.”
“It boosts collagen in the skin, smooths fine lines and wrinkles, minimises pigmentation, and it will even help with acne!”


"The best solution is to drink more water, sleep more and keep eye moisture!"
"It's often hereditary to wave goodbye to the bagestag circle."
"To fight dry skin in winter, you can add hyaluronic acid to help keep your skin hydrated."
"Solve the problem of seasonal skincare. If the product you use is suitable for your skin type, you don't have to change it with the seasons."
“3.”
Blue LED lights can kill the bacteria that cause acne and reduce inflammation
"If you encounter an emergency before the event, you can use the LED light for treatment at home or use the blue LED light."
"The best way to quickly repair red and inflamed skin is to stay away from products containing a lot of active substances and insist on using moisturizing and soothing products."
“2.”
"It can promote collagen in the skin, smooth fine lines and wrinkles, reduce pigmentation, and even help acne!"



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We go to the show separately with police escorts.””
“Martha carries one of those briefcases and I carry the other.”
““This is very unfortunate what happened.”
“...wasn t trying to be funny Oscars host Jimmy Kimmel also on stage joked about the disastrous incident...”
“This is not a joke Beatty explained to the star studded audience and viewers at home I opened the envelope and it said Emma Stone La La Land That s why I took such a long look at Faye I”
“Moonlight, you won best picture.”
“The film’s producer Jordan Horowitz quickly grabbed the microphone and announced, “There’s been a mistake.”
“In one of the most surprising reversals in the history of live television, headset-clad members of the Oscars crew scurried on stage to alert the La La Land team that something was wrong.”
“…But Wait, There’s More!”
“...the night s top prize and begin their thank you speeches...”


"We went to the show separately under the police escort."
"Martha has one briefcase and I have the other."
"It's a very unfortunate thing."
“… Not to be funny, Oscar host Jimmy Kimmel also joked on stage about this catastrophic incident... "
"It's not a joke," Biddy explained to the star audience and the family audience. "I opened the envelope and it said Emma stone Laran. That's why I've been looking at Fay I for so long."
"Moonlight, you won the best picture award."
Jordan Horowitz, the film's producer, quickly picked up the microphone and announced, "there's been a mistake."
"It's one of the most amazing reversals in the history of live television. Oscar crew members wearing headphones rushed to the stage to remind Lalan that there was something wrong with the team."
“… Wait, there's more! "
“… Tonight's top prize and start their thank you speech... "



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...have a happy life together...”
“But things have fizzled a bit because they almost expected this from him RELATED VIDEO Khloé Kardashian Has Basically Already Forgiven Tristan Thompson for Alleged Infidelity Source Despite the cheating scandal a source previously told PEOPLE the 33 year old believes that she and Thompson can figure things out and...”
““Her sisters and Kris are still furious,” the source said.”
“Image zoom Credit: Khloe Kardashian/InstagramAlthough the pair have been living together at the 27-year-old basketball player’s house in Cleveland since True’s birth, a source told PEOPLE in early May that the KarJenner family isn’t happy with the athlete.”
“...and still possess the authority to tell someone You got me f ed up Her post comes over a month after allegations surfaced that her boyfriend Tristan Thompson 27 had been unfaithful throughout her pregnancy...”
“Oh do we have the hiccups Image zoom True Thompson Credit Khloe Kardashian Hours before sharing the adorable mommy daughter photo the Good American designer seemingly alluded to relationships when she posted a photo of an original quote that read You can be a good person with a beautiful spirit...”
“How’s my little love?” Kardashian said in the clip.”
““Good morning, mama.”
““I love you, pretty girl.”The new mom also showered her daughter with love on Snapchat, as she documented baby True’s adorable case of the hiccups.”
““Happy one month old, mama,” Kardashian said in the video.”


“… Live a happy life together... "
"But it's a bit of a failure because they almost expected it, and from his related video, heloeka Daishan has basically forgiven Tristan Thompson for suspected sources of infidelity, even though the source of the fraud scandal told people before that the 33 year old believed she and Thompson could solve the problem and..."
"Her sister and Chris are still angry," the source said
"Credit for image zooming: Khloe Kardashian / instagram although has lived with the 27 year old basketball player in Cleveland since true was born. A source told people in early May that the kajana family were not satisfied with the player."
“…… More than a month after her boyfriend Tristan Thompson's 27 year old accusation of infidelity during her pregnancy surfaced, she still has the right to tell others that you let me ruin her position... "
"Oh, do we have a picture of burping zoomed true Thompson credit Khloe Kardashian a few hours ago shared a picture of lovely mommy's daughter when a good American designer seemed to allude to the relationship when she posted a photo of the original quote and read that you can be a good person with beautiful spirit..."
"How is my little love? "Kardashian said in the clip."
"Good morning, mom."
"I love you, pretty girl." The new mother also poured love into her daughter on snapchat, because she recorded baby true's lovely hiccups
"Happy one month old, mom," Kardashian said in the video



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We will be superheroes," he said at Knott's Scary Farm.”
“Jordan Fisher's routine is "very fast and very hard" -- but he's ready to nail it!”
“Here's what they said:Frankie is ready to bust out his best boy band dance moves -- with help from another contestant!”
“While we'll still have to wait for some surprises in the ballroom Monday night, a few of the dancing duos already told ET what their routines will be based on.”
“Kurtis Blow Vanessa Lachey Maks Chmerkovskiy Jazz Girls Just Want to Have Fun by Cyndi Lauper Victoria Arlen Val Chmerkovskiy Quickstep Tubthumping by Chumbawamba WATCH Frankie Muniz Shares Advice Nick Lachey Gave Him for Boy Band Themed DWTS Performance What are the stars guilty pleasures...”
“Nick Lachey Peta Murgatroyd Jazz Jump For My Love by The Pointer Sisters Nikki Bella Artem Chigvintsev Viennese Waltz Love on the Brain by Rihanna Sasha Pieterse Gleb Savchenko Jazz I Can t Help Myself Sugar Pie Honey Bunch by Four Tops Terrell Owens Cheryl Burke Salsa The Breaks by...”
“Charleston The Glory Days by Michael Giacchino Lindsey Stirling Mark Ballas Jive Wake Me Up Before You Go Go by Wham...”
“Derek Fisher Sharna Burgess Cha Cha The Fresh Prince of Bel Air by DJ Jazzy Jeff The Fresh Prince Drew Scott Emma Slater Argentine Tango Red Right Hand by Nick Cave The Bad Seeds Frankie Muniz Witney Carson Samba It s Gonna Be Me by NSYNC Jordan Fisher Lindsay Arnold...”
“What are the stars dancing to?”
“They were followed closely behind with a three-way tie between Derek Fisher & Sharna Burgess, Terrell Owens & Cheryl Burke and Nick Lachey & Peta Murgatroyd, who all received 19 points.”


"We're going to be superheroes," he said at Notte terror farm
Jordan Fisher's routine is "very fast and very difficult" - but he's ready
"They think that Frankie is going to perform his best boy band dance with the help of another contestant!"
"Although we have to wait for some surprises in the ballroom on Monday night, some duets have told et what their steps will be based on."
"Kurtis blow Vanessa Lachey maks chmerkovskiy Jazz girls just want to have fun by Cyndi Lauper Victoria Arlen val chmerkovskiy quickstep tumbling by chumbawamba watch Frankie Muniz share Nick Lachey's advice on boy band themed DWTS performance and show the guilty happiness of stars..."
"Jazz Nick Lachey PETA murgatroyd jumps for my love pointer sister Nikki Bella Artem chivintsev Vienna Waltz love brain Rihanna Sasha Pieters Gleb savchenko Jazz I can't control myself sugar pie honey string four top treel Owens Sheryl Burke sarsa breakthrough..."
"Before Charleston's glorious day awakened me by Michael jacinolin sesterlin and mark balasgiv, what are you going to..."
"Derek Fisher Shana Burgess Chacha" the fresh prince of Bel Air "DJ Jazz Jeff" the Fresh Prince "drew Scott Emma Slater" the red right hand of the Argentine Tango "Nick Cave" the bad seed "Frankie Muniz Witney Carson Samba" it's going to be me "nsync Jordan Fisher Lindsay Arnold..."
"What are the stars dancing with?"
"They were followed by a draw between Derek Fisher and Shana Burgess, Terrel Owens and Cheryl Burke, Nick Lach and PETA mulgatroyd, all with 19 points



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Not only do I not know, I’m not even going to see it,” Schwimmer told AdAge, and said he may try to convince someone to show him a cut of the chosen spot.”
“Not even the star knows which of the characters will ultimately be shown to Menendez.”
““I just thought it was really funny and inherently subversive,” says Schwimmer, who says Skittles’ ads appeal to his own sense of humor.”
“Schwimmer says he was intrigued by the idea of showing a Super Bowl-worthy commercial to a single person.”
“Taste the rainbow.”The final commercial is set to be shown only to Menendez, according to Skittles.”
“All films share the ungrammatical tagline “Exclusive the rainbow.”
“In each teaser Schwimmer wears a different wig; in another, he dons a mustache.”
“A quartet of 15-second teasers for the secretive DDB spot were released, in which Schwimmer plays four different characters, each with a quirkiness one would expect from the “Taste the Rainbow” candy brand.”
“Better known as Ross Geller from Friends, Schwimmer in the commercial Skittles says it will show during Super Bowl LII to a single fan, teenager Marcos Menendez of Los Angeles.”
“This time, he is the star of four teasers for a spot we’ll never see.”


"Not only do I not know, I'm not even going to see it," schweimer told the maxim, adding that he might try to persuade others to show him a piece of the selected site
"Even the stars don't know which character to show menenders in the end."
"I just think it's really funny, and it's inherently subversive," said schweimer, who said skittles's ads attracted his own sense of humor
"Schweimer said he was interested in the idea of showing a Super Bowl ad to a person."
"Taste the rainbow." According to skittles, the final ad will only be for Mercedes
All movies have an ungrammatical slogan, "exclusive rainbow."
"On each teaser, schweimer wore a different wig; on the other, he had a beard."
A 15 second quartet was released live for the mysterious DDB, in which Schwimmer plays four different roles, each of which has an eccentric person to look forward to from the "taste rainbow" candy brand
Schweimer, also known as Ross Geller in friends, said the film will be shown to a fan, Los Angeles teenager Marcos Menendez, during the Super Bowl LII
"This time, he's the top four teasers we'll never see."



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[22] The book chronicles her journey toward reinvention and self-acceptance in glamorous Las Vegas.”
“In May 2016, Holly released her second memoir The Vegas Diaries: Romance, Rolling the Dice and the Road to Reinvention, which debuted on The New York Times Bestseller list.”
“She also helped design and put together The Girls Next Door calendars.”
“During seasons three and four, Madison was shown working at the Playboy studios as an intern and later a junior photo editor.”
“The women were featured again on the covers of the September 2006, March 2008, and February 2009 issues.”
“Although Madison was never a Playboy Playmate, Playboy published a nude pictorial of Madison with her The Girls Next Door costars in the November 2005 issue.”
“Network show following life of Madison and others at the Playboy Mansion.”
“[9]Career [ edit ]2003–2009: The Girls Next Door [ edit ]The Girls Next Door was an E!”
“[8] Her appearance at these venues led to invitations to the Playboy Mansion and at the age of 21, after more than a year of such visits, Madison asked permission from Hugh Hefner and was allowed to move in at the mansion.”
“[2]To afford her college tuition, Madison competed to become a Hawaiian Tropic model and worked as a waitress at Hooters.”


"[22] this book records her journey to remolding and self acceptance in charming Las Vegas."
"In May 2016, Holly published her second memoir, the diary of Vegas: romance, dice and reinvention, which made it to the New York Times bestseller list for the first time."
"She also helped design and assemble the calendar for the girl next door."
In the third and fourth seasons, Madison worked as an intern at Playboy studios and later became a junior photo editor
"In September 2006, March 2008 and February 2009, these women were on the cover again."
"Although Madison has never been Playboy's playmate, Playboy published a nude pictorial of Madison's collaboration with the girl next door in Playboy magazine in November 2005."
"Pay attention to the online show of Madison and others' life in Playboy's official residence."
"[9] occupation [editor] 2003-2009: girl next door [editor] girl next door is an e!"
"Her presence in these places led to an invitation to the Playboy mansion. At the age of 21, after more than a year's visit, Madison got permission from Hugh Hefner and was allowed to move into the mansion."
To pay for college tuition, Madison competed to become a tropical model in Hawaii and worked as a waiter in a whistle shop



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Neither Simon nor Nick have any idea about the kind of crowd that frequents the Eagle, so when they freeze at the door the bouncer gives them a bit of advice.”
“...pic.twitter.com/5qLJxCDSBQ — Nick Robinson Updates (@dailynickrob) May 29, 2018In another clip, Simon seems depressed about something and where else does one get dragged to by friends when they need cheering up but the local Eagle?”
“New video Deleted Bar Scene from #LoveSimon starring Nick Robinson.”
“That is, at least until he gets asked for his ID.”
“After a brief flirtation and some prompting from Nick, Simon heads to the dancefloor with Haynes and things seems to be going well.”
“Related | The Cast of Love, Simon Talks the Film’s Emotional Coming Out SceneIn one scene Simon (Nick Robinson) has snuck into a club with his friend Nick (Jorge Lendeborg Jr.) and are approached by Colton Haynes’ character when he mistakes Simon for someone else.”
“...all things considered, but newly released scenes that were cut from the final version of the film show just how much gayer it could have been.”
“To be fair it seemed like a decently accurate representation of a small-town high school (what kind of city high school only has two or three gay students?)”
“Nick Robinson Meets Colton Haynes, Tries To Get Into the Eagle In Deleted Love, Simon ScenesSome people may have thought that Love, Simon, the mainstream romcom about gay teenager falling in love with an anonymous classmate at his high school, skimped a bit on the proverbial gay stuff.”


"Simon and Nick don't know what kind of crowd Eagles often have, so when they freeze at the door, bodyguards will give them some advice."
“... pic.twitter.com/5qLJxCDSBQ -Nick Robinson update (@ dailynickrob) May 29, 2018 in another video, Simon seems to be depressed about something. When friends need to cheer up, apart from the local eagles, where else will they drag them away? "
"The new video removes the bar scene of love Simon starring Nick Robinson."
"That is, at least before he is asked to show his ID card."
"After a brief flirtation and Nick's encouragement, Simon and Haines went to the dance floor and everything seemed to be going well."
Related to the actor of love, Simon tells about the emotional scenes in the film. In one scene, Simon (Nick Robinson) and his friend Nick (George Lundberg) sneak into a club. When Colton Haines' character mistakenly thinks Simon is someone else, he finds him
“…… Everything has been considered, but the latest release cut from the final version of the movie shows how happy it was
"To be fair, it seems to be a decent and accurate representation of a small town high school (what kind of city high school has only two or three gay students?"
"Nick Robinson meets Colton Haines and tries to enter the Simon scene of the eagle in love. Some people may think that love, Simon, a mainstream series about gay teenagers falling in love with an anonymous classmate in high school, skims a little bit of the well-known content of homosexuality."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Princess Eugenie Weds Jack BrooksbankThe Royal Line of Succession: 58 Brits in Line for the ThroneRoyal Wedding Gowns Through the Ages: See the Photos...”
“RELATED STORIESAnother Royal Wedding!”
“A champagne luncheon, hosted by the queen, took place just after the ceremony, with a second reception scheduled for the evening.”
“She wore a beautiful open-backed gown designed to show off her scar from surgery to correct her scoliosis, which she underwent at the tender age of 12.”
“Eugenie, 28, wed Jack Brooksbank, 32, at the same venue where Meghan Markle and Prince Harry tied the knot earlier this year.”
“The youngest members of the bridal party donned outfits by Amaia, one of Kate's preferred children's clothing brands.”
“As she visited her new baby brother, Prince Louis, at St. Mary's hospital in London earlier this year, she adorably waved at the crowd gathered outside.”
“This isn’t the first time we’ve caught a glimpse of Charlotte’s royal wave.”
“The 3-year-old daughter of Prince William and Kate Middleton served as a bridesmaid in the wedding, while her brother Prince George was a page boy.”
“Charlotte was captured repeatedly waving to the crowd from the steps of St. George's Chapel.”


"Princess Eugenie married Jack Brooksbank Royal Heirs: 58 Britons are queuing up to buy Royal Wedding Dresses: look at the pictures..."
Another royal wedding
As soon as the ceremony was over, the queen held a champagne lunch and arranged a second reception in the evening
She was wearing a beautiful open back robe to show off the scars from her scoliosis correction surgery at the age of 12
Eugenie, 28, and Jack Brooksbank, 32, got married in the same place where Megan markel and Prince Harry got married earlier this year
"The youngest members at the wedding party wore AMIA, one of Kate's favorite children's clothing brands."
Earlier this year, when she visited her newborn brother Prince Louis at St Mary's Hospital in London, she waved lovingly to the crowd gathered outside
"This is not the first time we have seen Charlotte's Royal disturbance."
"Prince William and Kate Middleton's three-year-old daughter are bridesmaids at the wedding, while her brother Prince George is a little boy."
"Charlotte was caught waving repeatedly to the crowd on the steps of St. George's church."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The queen," tweeted another.”
“Just learned from Rita Moreno s daughter that her mom will be wearing the same gown she wore to the Oscars in 1962 pic twitter com Sf6DdgC7jr Rebecca Keegan ThatRebecca March 3 2018 Moreno on hand to present an award...”
“The 86-year-old Hollywood legend returned to the Oscars red carpet sporting the iconic black-and-gold gown she wore to the 1962 Oscars, where she won the award for best supporting actress for "West Side Story."”
“Actress Rita Moreno arrives for the 90th Annual Academy Awards on March 4, 2018, in Hollywood, California.”
“VALERIE MACON / AFP /Getty ImagesDesigned by the late Filipino fashion legend Pitoy Moreno, who died on Jan. 15, the gown is made from the "obi" fabric used as wraps in Japanese kimonos.”
“"You think it would tarnish!”
“It’s been hanging in my closet," Moreno told Ryan Seacrest during E!”
“'s red carpet coverage Sunday night.”
“Sunday night added a few flourishes to make the dress even more stunning in 2018”
“"Bow down!!!!”


"Queen," another tweeted
"I just learned from Rita Moreno's daughter that her mother will wear the same dress for the 1962 Academy Awards ceremony. Pic twitter com sf6dgc7jr Rebecca Keegan that Rebecca will present the awards on March 3, 2018..."
The 86 year old Hollywood legend returned to the Oscars red carpet and won the best supporting actress award for "the West Side Story" in the iconic black and gold dresses of the 1962 Oscars
"Actress Rita Moreno will attend the 90th Academy Awards in Hollywood, California on March 4, 2018."
Valerie Macon / AFP / Getty Images, designed by the late Filipino fashion legend pitoy Moreno, who died on January 15, is made of "Obi" fabric used as a package in Japanese kimonos
"You think it will lose its luster!"
"It's been hanging in my closet," Moreno told Ryan Seacrest
"Sunday night's red carpet report."
"Sunday night added some gorgeous elements to make this dress even more amazing in 2018"
"Bow your head!!"



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH: Behind the Scenes of 'The Voice' With Alicia Keys and Adviser Shawn Mendes (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:PICS: Shawn Mendes' Sweet New Snap With Hailey Baldwin Fuels Dating RumorsRELATED: Camila Cabello Is 'Crying' Over Shawn Mendes' Comments About Her -- See What He Said!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Shawn Mendes Says He 'Chickened Out' Of Meeting Meghan Markle and Prince Harry (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“See more on Mendes in the video below!”
“Those rumors persisted as recently as February, when Mendes and Cabello were spotted holding hands at a pizza restaurant in New York City.”
“The 19-year-old artist has also been rumored to have dated ex-Fifth Harmony singer Camila Cabello, with the two denying a relationship but often appearing playful and flirty together.”
“Baldwin is not the first celeb Mendes has been linked to recently.”
“Mendes and Baldwin last posed for a pic together in a social media snap that the singer posted to Instagram last month, alongside a simple emoji caption.”
“Neilson Barnard/Getty ImagesThe pair were also spotted leaving an NYC hotel prior to the event, where Mendes was careful not to step on Baldwin's flowing train and offered a helping hand as the two stepped into their car.”


"Watch: behind the scenes' voice 'with Alicia Keys and consultant Sean Mendes (exclusive) related gallery..."
"Embedded code restart" content: Image: Sean Mendez and Haley Baldwin's sweet new snapshot dating rumor related: Camilla Cabello is "crying" for Sean Mendez's comments on her - see what he says
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Sean Mendes said he was" cowered "from meeting Megan markel and Prince Harry (exclusive). This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information. "
"Please see more about Mendes in the video below!"
The rumors continued until February, when Mendes and Cabello were found holding hands at a pizza shop in New York City
The 19-year-old artist is also rumored to have dated former fifth harmonic singer Camilla Cabello, who denies love but often appears playful together
"Baldwin is not the first celebrity Mendez has contacted recently."
"Last month, Mendes and Baldwin took a picture together on social media with a simple expression on it."
"Nelson Barnard / Getty photo before the event, the two were also found to have left a hotel in New York. Mendes was careful not to step on Baldwin's moving train and extended a helping hand when they got on the train."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Switch to Latino Español Feedback Help en Choose a language United States English en United States español es Music Reviews Music News Video Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية”
“Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines...”
“...msn back to msn home entertainment powered by Microsoft News Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
At present, in each of 1575 chechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechecheche Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut
"English polskapolski portugal portuguese Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomi Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rk è e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States English American Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ≤ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ P ιιιι P Чхישש㪞ביתاااااالبببببةااا
"Germany - Germany - Spain - France - France - India - English - India - India - India - India - New Zealand - Norway - Norway - Bokmal international version of the ú sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa? Ol Philippines..."
“… MSN return to MSN family entertainment from Microsoft support news jump to navigation jump to content login change language content Africa French French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canada English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spanish Denmark … “



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She and Carmelo have been married since 2010.”
“I have my husband here, my friends here, it’s a really exciting time,' the 39-year old television personality admitted.”
“The couple, who have been living separately since April of 2017, have reportedly been spending more time together.”
“'We’re good.”
“I mean, we’ve been together for a really long time so we’re figuring out how to make it work for what is best for (our 11-year-old son) Kiyan and what is best for us,' La La revealed in an interview with People.”
“Mending fences?”
“Carmelo Anthony and La La Anthony attended the Lumiere De Vie Hommes Launch Event Aboard Superyacht Utopia IV on Saturday in New York City the couple are pictured during NY Fashion Week in September 2018 La La and the NBA superstar looked like a blissful couple when they arrived with...”
“...their son for the launch of grooming line Lumiere de Vie Hommes aboard a yacht in New York City on Saturday...”
“At one point, she sat down on Carmelo’s lap and the two started making out as Beyoncé’s hit tune Love On Top rocked the house, according to the magazine.”
“'We’re having fun!”


"She and Carmelo have been married since 2010."
"My husband is here, my friends are here, it's a very exciting moment," the 39 year old television celebrity admits
"It is reported that the couple have been separated since April 2017 and have been together for a longer time."
"We're fine."
"I mean, we've been together for a really long time, so we're trying to figure out how to make it best for (our 11 year old son) Keyang and for us," Lala told people magazine
"The fence?"
"Carmelo Anthony and Lala Anthony attended the launch of" human life "on the super yacht Utopia 4 in New York City on Saturday. The couple were photographed at New York Fashion Week in September 2018. Lala and the NBA superstar looked like a happy couple when they arrived... "
“… Their son was on a yacht in New York on Saturday for the launch of the "human life" beauty series
According to the magazine, once she was sitting on Carmelo's lap, and they began to make out. Beyonce's hit song "love on top" shocked the audience
"We had a good time!"



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“His Instagram is filled with pictures of Louis Vuitton bling, stacks of cash, Chronic, and Cadillacs.”
“Postscript: According to his Instagram and Facebook feed, Ajar is still living large.”
“We are obsessed, I believe because we want an inside look into the real life of these celebrities and we enjoy publicly scrutinizing people because they “sin” differently then we do.”
“She wrote on her blog: “This obsession is what makes the Bling Ring so prevalent almost 5 years after the initial robbery took place and it is because, I believe, that a majority of society is just as sick as these teens were.”
“Since cleaning up, she’s been vocal about her skepticism of Coppola’s movie.”
“But prior to that, she had been arrested for possession of black tar heroin, and was ordered to spend a year in residential rehab.”
“She just gave birth to a baby girl, Harper, and is married to Evan Haines, whom she met while attending Alcoholics Anonymous meetings.”
“While she’s currently living a happy life, it’s been a long road.”
“Postscript: The most public member of the Bling Ring, Neiers, now 21, documents her life on her blog and her Twitter account.”
“Sentenced to 180 days in jail; served 30 days with three years probation and $600,000 restitution to Bloom.”


"His instagram is full of Louis Vuitton blings, piles of cash, chronic diseases and pictures of Cadillac."
"Postscript: according to his instagram and Facebook feed, ajar is still living well."
"I believe that we are obsessed because we want to have a deeper understanding of the real lives of these celebrities, and we like to look at people openly because their" criminal "ways are different from ours."
"It's this obsession that makes aura so prevalent nearly five years after the initial robbery, I believe, because most people in society are as sick as these teenagers," she wrote on her blog
"She has been skeptical about Coppola's films since the clean-up."
But before that, she had been arrested for possession of black tar heroin and ordered to give up drugs in a shelter for one year
She just gave birth to a baby girl, Harper, and married Evan Haines, whom she met at an anonymous abstinence party
"Although she's living a happy life at the moment, it's a long way to go."
"Postscript: neiers, the most public member of bling ring, is now 21 years old and has recorded her life on her blog and Twitter account."
"Was sentenced to 180 days in prison; served 30 days, suspended for three years, and paid bloom $600000."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I was conquering the world, but then I would come crashing down, and I would be more depressed than ever.””
““I was actually manic a lot of the times that I would take on workloads, and I would say, ‘Yes, I can do this, I can do this, I can do this,’” she recalled.”
“Demi Lovato appeared on iHeartRadio’s “Label Defiers” podcast with Elvis Duran on Tuesday, August 1, to discuss how she feels about labels she often receives.”
“The pop star, 24, revealed that there’s one designation in particular that bothers her.”
““I think when people refer to me as being bipolar, it’s something that’s true — I am bipolar — but I don’t like people to use it as a label,” Lovato said.”
““It’s something that I have.”
“It’s not who I am.”The “Body Say” singer added that there are some labels she wouldn’t mind.”
““I think Demi Lovato, activist, is something I’d really be proud of,” she said.”
“Lovato has been outspoken about living with mental illness.”
“In 2011, she sought treatment for an eating disorder, depression and self-harm, and she was diagnosed with bipolar disorder.”


"I was conquering the world at that time, but then I would collapse, and I would be more depressed than ever."
"In fact, I'm manic a lot of the time, and I take on work, and I say," yes, I can do it, I can do it, I can do it, "she recalled
On Tuesday, August 1, Demi Lovato appeared on iHeartRadio and Elvis Duran's "label defier" podcast to discuss her feelings about the labels she often receives
"The 24-year-old pop star revealed that there was a special title that bothered her."
"I think it's true when people call me bipolar - I'm bipolar - but I don't like it as a label," Lovato said
"This is what I have."
"It's not who I am," the body said singer added, adding that some labels she wouldn't mind
"I think the activist Demi Lovato is something I'm really proud of," she said
"Lovato has been outspoken about his mental illness."
"In 2011, she sought treatment for eating disorders, depression and self mutilation and was diagnosed with bipolar disorder."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out a clip from the episode below:Related: Kylie Jenner’s Shaman Spilled Some Serious “T” About Her Love LifeCheck this out:”
“"Since you know, it's been a few years now, we thought we should just take this to the next level.”
“...series Life of Kylie wrapped up on Sunday night (September 17), and it sure didn’t disappoint.”
“In fact, like many popular series finales, there was a wedding.”
“No, Kylie didn’t tie the knot with a rumored boyfriend or anything — rather, on the finale episode, she tied the knot with her BFF, model Jordyn Woods.”
“Well, kind of.”
“We already knew that Kylie and Jordyn have quite the bond.”
“"I actually feel like I'm in a full relationship with Kylie," Jordyn said in an earlier teaser for the show.”
“"There are different types of relationships — we're definitely in one.”
“Not necessarily sexual, but definitely emotional.”


"Look at the clip of this episode: related: Kelly Jenner's shaman sprinkles some serious" t "words about her love life. Look at this:
"Now that you know, it's been a few years, we think we should take this to a new level."
“… Kelly's series ends on Sunday night (September 17) and it's definitely not disappointing. "
"In fact, like many popular series endings, there's a wedding."
"No, Kelly didn't marry her rumored boyfriend or anything - more specifically, in the last episode, she married her boyfriend, model Jordan woods."
"Well, a little."
"We've known for a long time that Kelly and Jordan have a good relationship."
"I really think I have a good relationship with Kelly," Jordan said in an earlier tease
"There are different types of relationships - we must be in one."
"Not necessarily sexual, but definitely emotional."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That is wrong!'”
“'That's not drama Vicki — that is wrong!”
“You take that up with Michael.'”
“Don't blame me.”
“It's his responsibility to tell you.”
“Vicki screamed at her: 'I thought he would tell you.”
“...on the defensive and started angrily attacking Kelly for suggesting she had done anything wrong...”
“Feelings hurt Newly single Kelly was outraged at Vicki for not telling her about hooking up Michael Getting heated Vicki insisted that she did nothing wrong as Kelly grew increasingly upset Her inquiry soon escalated however when Vicki quickly got...”
“I didn't know where it was going and it was none of my business.'”
“'They communicated afterwards and I was out.”


"That's wrong!"
"That's not drama, Vicki - that's wrong!"
"You go talk to Michael."
"Don't blame me."
"It's his duty to tell you."
"Wiki screamed at her: 'I thought he would tell you.'
“…… On the defensive, she began to attack Kelly angrily because she hinted that she had done something wrong... "
"The newly single Kelly is very angry with Wiki because she didn't tell her about her hooking up with Michael. Wiki insists that she didn't do anything wrong, because Kelly is getting more and more unhappy. Her investigation escalates quickly, but when wiki gets it soon..."
"I don't know where it's going, and it's none of my business."
"They communicated later, and I went out."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“In case you haven't heard, he's really big on catching fans trying to take pics of him.”
“He has compiled the funniest cases on his super famous Instagram account called Camera Duels.”
“And to make things even more interesting, each pic is paired with a caption that offers a play-by-play of the encounter.”
“Well, it looks like fans are taking it to the next level.”
“Janani Krishnan was googling the Riverdale star at an ice cream shop, and Cole was quick to notice.”
“So, he captured the moment and posted the pic on his Instagram story.”
“Naturally, it went viral.”
“Before you jump to conclusions though, let Janani explain herself.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"If you haven't heard about it, he really likes to take pictures of his fans."
"He compiled the funniest cases on his super famous instagram account," camera duel. "
"In order to make things more interesting, each photo has a subtitle, providing one encounter after another."
"Well, it seems fans have taken it to a new level."
"Janani Krishnan googled for stars in Riverdale at an ice cream shop, and Cole soon noticed."
"So he seized the moment and posted the photo on instagram."
"Naturally, it became popular."
"But before you come to a conclusion, let janani explain for himself."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll down to see her new outfit and shop it for yourself.”
“Finally, a neutral-color tote bag is all you need to copy Middleton's easy, breezy look.”
“Her flowy, bump-friendly Claudie Pierlot Paisley Print Chiffon Dress ($285) is the perfect transitional dress that can easily be worn with tights when winter hits.”
“Photographed on a shopping trip in London, Middleton may have been wearing designer sneakers (Jimmy Choo Miami Sneakers, to be exact), but her look is easy to re-create with white sneakers you already own.”
“But don't forget about everyone's favorite royal sister: Pippa Middleton, who is expecting her first child with husband James Matthews.”
“...quickly approaching...”
“The royal family has a lot going on right now Kate Middleton just returned from maternity leave Princess Eugenie s wedding is this Friday and Meghan Markle and Prince Harry s two week trip to Australia and New Zealand is...”


"Scroll down to see her new clothes and buy them yourself."
"At the end of the day, you just need a neutral handbag to mimic Middleton's relaxed, relaxed look."
"Her elegant, bumpy, Claude Pirlo Paisley Print Chiffon Dress (285 dollars) is the perfect transition to a tights when winter comes."
"In the photos taken while shopping in London, Middleton may be wearing brand-name sneakers (to be exact, Jimmy Choo Miami sneakers), but her look is easy to reshape with the white sneakers you already have."
"But don't forget everyone's favorite sister: Pippa Middleton, who is pregnant with her husband, James Matthews, for the first time."
“… Quick approach... "
"The royal family has a lot to do now. Kate Middleton has just returned from her maternity leave. The wedding of Princess Eugenie is this Friday. Megan markel and Prince Harry's two-week trip to Australia and New Zealand is..."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Florence van Cutsem, aged 3: Goddaughter of Prince Harry and daughter of Alice van Cutsem and Major Nicholas van Cutsem.”
“Kensington Palace previously stated that the bride-to-be will have no adult bridesmaids 'because she's unable to choose between her friends', and will instead be surrounded by children as page boys, bridesmaids and flower girls.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Prince Harry and Ms Meghan Markle have chosen the Bridesmaids and Page Boys for their Wedding on Saturday 19th May RoyalWedding https t co fRX7IA5Cn9 The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge KensingtonRoyal May 16 2018 The bridesmaids include Princess Charlotte Florence van Custem Remi Litt Rylan Litt Ivy Mulroney and...”
“Zalie Warren...”
“Meanwhile, the page boys are Prince George, Jasper Dyer, Brian Mulroney and John Mulroney.”
“Prince George and Princess Charlotte will be dusting off their tails and flower baskets on Saturday as they previously performed similar wedding roles at the wedding of Pippa Middleton, the Duchess of Cambridge's younger sister, to James Matthews in May last year.”
“Getty ImagesHere’s your break down of who the bridesmaids and pageboys are:Who are the bridesmaids?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
Florence van cutson, 3: Prince Harry's goddaughter, daughter of Alice van cutson and major Nicholas van cutson
"Kensington Palace has previously said that the bride to be will not have an adult Bridesmaid" because she can't choose between friends, "but will be surrounded by children as bookboys, bridesmaids and flower girls."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Prince Harry and Ms. Megan Marcel have chosen bridesmaids and page boys for their wedding on Saturday, May 19, Royal Wedding: HTTPS t Co frx7ia5cn9 royal wedding of the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge Kensington on May 16, 2018, bridesmaids include Princess Charlotte Florence van castem Remy little Ryland little Ivy Moroni and...."
"Zari Warren..."
"At the same time, the paging boys are Prince George, Jasper Dale, Brian muroni and John muroni."
"Prince George and Princess Charlotte will dust off their tails and flower baskets on Saturday because they played a similar role at the wedding of Pippa Middleton, sister of the Duchess of Cambridge, to James Matthews last May."
"Getty Images here is your breakdown of who is the bridesmaid and pager. Who are you the bridesmaid?"



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They had a tumultuous relationship before officially breaking up this spring after Jenner began spending time with Scott.”
“[He] is trying to rub this in my face and make me feel some type of way, but I don’t.”Tyga and Jenner kept silent about their romance for months before going public shortly before her 18th birthday.”
““The fact that Jonathan would take it to this level is so bizarre for me.”
““This is super awkward,” she said.”
“The reality star shared a photo of them together in March 2016, tweeting, “LOOK WHO I MET…”In the episode, Kardashian’s best friend, Jonathan Cheban, brought Osman along to make the mother of two jealous for not hanging out with him.”
“Osman appeared in an episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians in June 2016, where even Kardashian, 36, was shocked by their similarities.”
“Tyga responded with a now-deleted Snapchat photo, saying, “Hell nah thats my kid.”Image zoom Credit: NGRE/BACKGRIDTyga and Jenner, 20, split in April.”
““He’s really into her.”The news comes after sources confirmed to PEOPLE that Tyga’s ex, Kylie Jenner, is pregnant with her and Travis Scott‘s first child.”
““They are full on dating,” the source says.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"After Jenna started spending time with Scott, their relationship was chaotic until they officially broke up this spring."
"(he) is trying to put this on my face to make me feel something, but I'm not." TEGA and Jenna were silent for several months before their public love affair shortly before their 18th birthday
"In fact, Jonathan will bring it to this level, which is so strange to me."
"It's embarrassing," she said
"The reality star shared a photo of them together in March 2016, and he said on his micro blog," look who I met... " In this episode, Kardashian's best friend, Jonathan Cheban, takes Osman with her and makes her two children's mothers jealous because they are not with Osman. "
"Osman appeared in the June 2016 episode" keep up with Kardashian, "and even Kardashian, 36, was shocked by their similarities
"TEGA replied that a snapchat photo that has now been deleted said," hell, that's my child. "Image zooming credit: ngre / backgrid, TEGA and Jenner, 20, split up in April."
"He really likes her." Sources confirmed that TEGA's ex girlfriend, Kelly Jenner, was pregnant with her first child with Travis Scott
"They're all dating," the source said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He seems to cling to every half-truth about his relationship with Ms. Brown that makes him look like he’s the real victim.”
“It’s fascinating to see Mr. Simpson blasting the media, all while frequently reminding Ms. Regan of his past reputation as a successful and popular guy.”
“According to the executive producer, Terry Wrong, Fox dug up this interview to satisfy the huge demand for more O.J.-related television.”
“The former network executive Preston Beckman known on Twitter as the Masked Scheduler noted in a blog post that Fox probably intentionally showed it on Sunday night to counterprogram ABC s premiere of the revived American Idol They probably don t want egg on their face if AI returns with...”
“...an impressive number he said...”
“In interviews leading up to the broadcast, both Ms. O’Brien and Mr. Wrong stressed that Mr. Simpson didn’t get a dime for this special.”
“He was reportedly paid $800,000 for the book “If I Did It” in 2006, but got no money for the interview then, according to Fox.”
“Fox, on the other hand, definitely stands to benefit — which was one of the complaints levied before the broadcast was scrapped the first time.”
“Fox, Ms. Regan, Ms. O’Brien and Mr. Darden have all insisted that “The Lost Confession” is a vital document in the era of #MeToo and #TimesUp.”
“The special was framed as a look inside the mind of a domestic abuser, and perhaps a warning to any woman who might be in a relationship with someone who talks the way Mr. Simpson does in the interview.”


"He seems to stick to every and every half truth about his relationship with Ms. brown, which makes him look like a real victim."
"It's fun to see Mr. Simpson bashing the media, and often remind Reagan that he used to be a successful and popular man."
"According to executive producer Terry frost, fox chose this interview to meet the huge demand for more O.J. - related TV programs."
"Preston Beckman, the former network director, is known as the masked dispatcher on twitter. In a blog post, he pointed out that fox may have deliberately shown ABC's" American Idol "premiere on Sunday night if AI has They may not want eggs on their faces
“… An impressive number, he said
"In an interview before the show, Ms. O'Brien and Mr. frott stressed that Mr. Simpson didn't get a cent from the special show."
"It was reported that in 2006, if I did, he was paid $800000 for the book, but he didn't get an interview fee at that time," fox said
"Fox, on the other hand, will definitely benefit from it - this is one of the complaints before the first cancellation of broadcasting."
"Fox, Reagan, O'Brien and Darden all insist that the lost confession is an important document of meto'o and the era of progress."
"The special was designed as a look in the heart of a domestic abuser, perhaps as a warning to any woman who might have a relationship with someone who spoke like Mr. Simpson did in the interview."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You have to give life time and know that the universe is going to give you what you need.””
“Image zoom Milo Ventimiglia | Credit: Michael Rozman/Warner Bros.”
“Milo Ventimiglia‘s face was all wet on Wednesday’s episode of The Ellen DeGeneres Show — and for once it wasn’t caused by tears induced by This is Us.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“During a game of “Make It Rain,” the 40-year-old actor was challenged to answer trivia questions to win money for charity.”
“The only hiccup?”
“In order to get the check, he’d have to pull on chords stemming from an array of umbrellas, each outfitted to either dump the money or a bucket of water on him.”
“Playing against So You Think You Can Dance star Stephen “tWitch” Boss, Ventimiglia scored big throughout the game.”
“He confidently named the biggest drama queen in the cast of This Is Us (that would be Emmy-winner Sterling K. Brown), and navigated his way through DeGeneres’ trick question about how many feet he has “on him” (two).”
“The talk show host even gave him a pass when he was tasked with spelling his name backwards and missed the “t.”Image zoom Stephen ‘tWitch’ Boss and Milo Ventimiglia | Credit: Michael Rozman/Warner Bros.”


"You have to give life time and know that the universe will give you what you need."
"Image zooming Milo Ventimiglia | credit: Michael Rothman / Warner Brothers."
"Milo Ventimiglia's face was drenched on Wednesday's Ellen DeGeneres Show - this time, it wasn't the tears we caused."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In a" let it rain "competition, the 40 year old actor was asked to answer trivial questions to win money for charity."
"The only hiccup?"
"In order to get the check, he had to string up a row of umbrellas, each equipped with either money or a bucket of water."
"Twitch" in the game against Stephen, the star you think you can dance with. Boss, ventimilia scored a lot in the whole game
"He confidently nominated us as the biggest drama queen in the group (that would be Emmy winner Stirling K. Brown), and passed the trick question of DeGeneres: how many feet does he have on him" (2)
"The talk show host even gave him a pass because he was asked to spell his name upside down and missed the word" T. " Zoom in and out Stephen twitch boss and Milo Ventimiglia | source: Michael Rozman / Warner Bros. "



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““However busy I feel, Shonda feels busier, so I’m just going to rise to the occasion.””
“And when it comes to balance, the four-time Emmy-nominated star says she taps into her Scandal character Olivia Pope for inspiration.”
“There s always another way Kerry Washington tells Net a Porter magazine of the mantra she sometimes repeats to herself Working Mom Kerry Washington Talks Being Covered in Spit Up on a Conference Call While Pumping This Is My Perfect It s hard to imagine Kerry Washington as anything other...”
“...than a glamorous star but her situation is sometimes very relatable to most parents...”
“The Scandal star sat down with Net-A-Porter for their magazine The Edit‘s most recent cover story, and took some time between political discussion — both real-life and small-screen — to dish on her life as a working mom.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I can be covered in spit-up on a conference call while I’m pumping and that’s okay, because this is my perfect,” she says, breastfeeding her 7-month-old son Caleb Kelechi during the interview.”
“Adds the actress, 40, “It may not be somebody else’s, but this is mine.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“RELATED VIDEO: It’s Kerry Washington’s 40th Birthday — Let’s Look Back at Her TransformationWashington and her husband, 35-year-old former San Francisco 49ers cornerback Nnamdi Asomugha, are also parents to daughter Isabelle Amarachi, 3.”


"No matter how busy I feel, shoda feels even busier, so I just want to solve it."
"When it comes to balance, the four time Emmy nominated star said she was inspired by her scandalous character Olivia Pope."
"There's always another way, Kerry Washington told webport magazine's mantra that she sometimes repeats her work. Mom Kerry Washington talks are vomited on a conference call, and pump this is my perfect, it's hard to imagine Kerry Washington as anything else..."
“… More than a glamorous star, but her situation is sometimes very relevant to most parents... "
The scandal star sat with net-a-porter magazine, the editor's latest cover story, and spent some time between political discussions, including real life and small screen, telling about her life as a working mother
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I can spit on the phone, which doesn't matter, because it's perfect for me," she said, feeding her 7-month-old son Caleb kellich in an interview
The 40 year old actress added: "it may not be someone else's, but it's mine." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Related video: today is Kerry Washington's 40th birthday - let's review her transformation. Washington and her husband, former San Francisco 49ers guard enramdi asomga, 35, are the parents of her 3-year-old daughter Isabel amarach."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With all these people around, there’s got to be at least one he can talk to.”
“.”
“Also, it appears they adopted a stray dog!”
“They wind up talking, as Jack promises to confide in her more.”
“And in the past, we see Rebecca trying to sweep Jack off his feet after a lengthy dry spell.”
“They appear to have a breakthrough as Randall explains his own upbringing and adoption to Deja, but when she finds out that her mother might be in jail for a long time, she storms off.”
“...a little more closed-off than they expected.”
“Meanwhile, Randall and Beth’s new foster daughter, Deja, arrives, and she’s.”
“Here’s hoping Kevin learns the lessons his father might not have had time to fully grasp, and figures out how to confront his inner demons with a little help from his family.”


"With so many people around, at least one person he can talk to."
“.”
"Besides, it seems that they have adopted a stray dog!"
"They finally started talking because Jack promised to talk to her more."
"In the past, we saw Rebecca try to sweep jack off her feet after a long drought."
"When Randall explained to dja about her upbringing and adoption, they seemed to have a breakthrough, but when she found out that her mother might have been in prison for a long time, she left immediately."
“… It's more closed than they expected. "
"Meanwhile, dya, Randall's and Beth's new adopted daughter, is here. She's dead."
"I hope Kevin can learn the lesson that his father may not have time to master completely, and find out how to face the inner demons with the help of his family."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“Guy Pearce and Kevin Spacey co-starred in Curtin Henson’s 1997 neo-noir film “L.A.”
“Confidential,” and Pearce suggests in a new interview with Australian talk show host Andrew Denton that Spacey got inappropriate with him during production.”
“Spacey has been accused of sexual harassment and abuse by serval men, including “Star Trek: Discovery” and “Rent” actor Anthony Rapp.”
“During the interview, Pearce was asked about Spacey’s history of abuse and working with the actor early in their careers.”
“Pearce did not want to reveal too much about his experiences with Spacey, but he did imply nonprofessional behavior when he said, “Yeah.”
“Tough one to talk about at the moment.”
“Amazing actor, incredible actor.”
“Mmm.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
Guy pierce and Kevin Spacey co starred in Curtin Hansen's 1997 new black film Los Angeles
"Confidential," Pierce said in a new interview with Australian talk show host Andrew Denton that spacey was out of place with him in the production process
Spacey was charged with sexual harassment and abuse of men, including Star Trek: discovery and rent actor Anthony Rapp
"In the interview, Pierce was asked about Spacey's history of abuse and how he worked with the actor early in their careers."
Pierce doesn't want to reveal much about his experience with spacey, but he does imply unprofessional behavior when he says "yes."
"It's hard to say at the moment."
"Great actor, great actor."
"Well."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Tristan has been an angel to me!””
““Having a partner that is equally as excited as you are, and is such a support system, is crucial!” Kardashian wrote.”
“FROM COINAGE: The Lavish Lifestyle of the Kardashian KidsThe Revenge Body host continued to praise her NBA star boyfriend on her website, making it clear how thankful she has been to have him by her side throughout her pregnancy.”
“He’s always so reassuring and confident about everything when it comes to our baby.”Image zoom Credit: Khloe Kardashian/InstagramWhile this is the first child for the expectant mama, Thompson is already dad to a 13-month-old son named Prince Oliver with ex-girlfriend Jordan Craig.”
“He’s helped me overcome any fear or anxiety that I have!”
““I’m so blessed that Tristan has been beyond supportive!”
“Kardashian continued...”
“Image zoom Khloé Kardashian and Tristan Thompson Credit Khloe Kardashian Instagram RELATED VIDEO Inside the Moment Khloé Kardashian Told Her Family She s Pregnant I Feel Really Blessed Of course it s such a blessing and such an exciting thing but I do believe your initial reaction is always nerves...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
““I was nervous and he was so excited!”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"Tristan is my angel!"
"To have a partner as excited as you are, is such a support system, is crucial! "Kardashian wrote."
"Excerpt from the Mint: the luxurious life of Kardashian Kidd, the host of revenge continues to praise his NBA star boyfriend on his website, clearly showing how grateful he is to have him around during his pregnancy."
"When it comes to our children, he is always so assured and confident in everything." Image zooming source: Khloe Kardashian / instagram while this is the first child for the expectant mama, Thompson is already dad to a 13 month old son Prince Oliver with the EXE friend Jordan Craig
"He helped me overcome all my fears and anxieties!"
"I'm so lucky that Tristan no longer supports me!"
"Kardashian went on..."
"Image zooming khlo é Kardashian and Tristan Thompson credit khlo é Kardashian instagram Related videos khlo é Kardashian told her family that I was really happy when she was pregnant. Of course, this is such a happy and exciting thing, but I believe your first reaction is always nervous..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"I'm nervous and he's excited! "Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Are they?” she asks, knowing that they’re not.”
“Kristin asks Cutler an important question: “What are your sunglasses?”“Awesome,” he replies.”
“Then, Kristin notices that the shipping price is wrong.”
““Drop the hammer on some people,” Cutler advises after Kristin’s short rant about Shannon always messing up.”
“Kristin reads the newsletter and immediately notices that Shannon messed up the link – again.”
“The next day the Uncommon James homegoods line launches online.”
“Kristin thanks him in her speech for being a “super dad” and giving her time to get her store off the ground, a dream she says she’s had for seven years.”
“The rest of the launch party goes fine and Jay Cutler appears finally in the scene as a very supportive husband.”
““It’s ratchet,” she declares.”
“Also, Kristin makes a good point: “People remember the alcohol, they don’t remember the food.”Which, it turns out, is good because social media manager Shannon declares the sushi is from the grocery store.”


"Yes? "She asked, knowing they were not."
Christine asked Cutler an important question: "what are your sunglasses? "Great," he replied
"Then Christine noticed that the freight was wrong."
"Hit some people with hammers," Cutler suggested after Christine briefly accused Shannon of always messing up
"Christine read the press release and immediately noticed that Shannon had messed up the links again."
"The next day, the unusual James household products line up."
"In her speech, Christine thanks him for being a" super dad "and giving her time to open her shop. She said it was her dream for seven years."
"The rest of the press conference went well, and Jay Cutler finally showed up as a very supportive husband."
"It's a ratchet," she said
In addition, Christine also made a good point: "people remember wine, but they don't remember food." That turns out to be a good thing, because Shannon, social media manager, claims sushi comes from the grocery store



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gorgeous: The young star has strong features and a killer physique'It must be very difficult to accept the fact that the person you're interested in lives in love with someone else #oops #goodluck!”
“On September 11, the brunette beauty mused about her love life on her Facebook page, leaving a somewhat cryptic post about being in love with somebody that was in love with someone else.”
“He was still wearing the same outfit he was in when he was spotted spending time with Eiza.”
“Later in the evening, Liam was seen going for dinner with his mother Leonie at the Chateau Marmont in West Hollywood.”
“...previous evening as he covered his face with a New York Yankees baseball cap and a pair of sunglasses...”
“The actor covered his face with a Yankees baseball cap and a pair of large sunglasses Sexy senorita Eiza was looking sultry in a black camisole top Close It appears that Liam and Eiza have already grown quite close And it appeared that he had had a late night the...”
“Long night?”
“Meanwhile, Liam flashed a hint of his boxer shorts in a pair of low-slung jeans teamed with a white T-shirt.”
“The stunning star was relatively make-up free and swept her hair into no fuss ponytail.”
“The pair were leaving a residential home, hopping into a black SUV togetherBoth were wearing casual clothing for the outing, with the Mexican singer and actress looking sultry in a black camisole top.”


"Gorgeous: this young star has strong facial features and killer physique. It must be hard for you to accept the fact that the person you are interested in falls in love with another person. Good luck
"On September 11, the brunette pondered her love life on Facebook and left a mysterious post saying that she fell in love with someone else."
"When he was found with eza, he was still wearing the same clothes as before."
Later in the evening, Liam and his mother, Lionel, were seen going to malmont castle in West Hollywood for dinner
“…… The night before, he was wearing a New York Yankees baseball cap and sunglasses, covering his face... "
"The actor was wearing a Yankee baseball cap and a pair of big sunglasses to cover her face. The sexy Miss Elsa looked sultry in a black tank top. It seems that Liam and Aisha are very close. It seems that he went to bed very late last night... "
"Long night?"
Meanwhile, Liam was wearing a pair of low rise jeans and a white T-shirt, revealing a bit of his boxer shorts
"This amazing star doesn't make up and combs his hair into a humble ponytail."
They left a house and jumped into a black SUV. Both of them went out in casual clothes, and the Mexican singer and actress looked sultry in a black vest



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Justin TImberlake/InstagramJustin Timberlake and son Silas...”
“Silas, who turns 3 on Sunday, was born in April 2015.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Justin Timberlake and Jessica Biel needed some extra help after things didn t go according to plan during the birth of their son Silas Justin Timberlake and Jessica Biel Reveal She Had an Emergency C Section to Deliver Son Silas Justin Timberlake and Jessica Biel needed some extra help after...”
“...things didn t exactly go according to plan during the birth of their son Silas Randall...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Sharing that their journey with Simpson began the day we brought our son home from the hospital the couple wrote that when they returned home they were exhausted disillusioned and totally in shock I was obsessed with everything organic toxin free natural and homeopathic for our kid who came into...”
“...this world in an operating room through an incision they wrote in the ET excerpt...”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“And, ‘Am I going to completely mess this kid up?’ ” he explained.”


"Credit for image zooming: Justin Timberlake / instagram, Justin Timberlake and son Silas..."
"Silas turned three on Sunday and was born in April 2015."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Justin Timberlake and Jessica bell when their sons Silas Justin Timberlake and Jessica bell were born, things didn't go as planned and they needed some extra help. Justin Timberlake and Jessica bell revealed that she had an emergency caesarean section to deliver her son Silas Justin Timberlake. Jessica bell needs some extra help... "
“…… When their son Silas Randall was born, things didn't go exactly as planned... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Sharing their journey with Simpson started on the day we took our son home from the hospital. The couple wrote that when they came home, they were exhausted, disillusioned and completely shocked. I was addicted to all kinds of natural and homeopathic therapies without organic toxins, and our children walked into..."
“… The world in the operating room, through an incision, they wrote in the ET excerpt that
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"And," will I make a mess of this child? "He explained



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nikki Bella and Brie Bella also serve as Executive Producers.”
“Total Bellas is produced by WWE and Bunim/Murray Productions with Gil Goldschein, Russell Jay and Farnaz Farjam Chazan serving as Executive Producers for Bunim/Murray Productions and Kevin Dunn serving as Executive Producer for WWE.”
“...has given a fourth season greenlight to its hit series Total Bellas.”
“The renewal comes as the series, which follows the lives of WWE superstars Nikki Bella and Brie Bella, finished its third season with its best numbers to date.”
“Season 3 was its highest-rated season ever among all key demos, drawing nearly 1 million total viewers per episode, up 22% from the previous season among the core P18-49 demographic, according to the network and Nielsen.”
“Sunday night premieres of Total Bellas ranked among the Top 10 programs in primetime across ad-supported cable with W18-34 and W18-49.”
“Season three also averaged more than 4MM social engagements a week, +123% higher average weekly engagements vs.”
“Season 2 (1.8MM).”
“Total Bellas currently has 1.1MM social followers, gaining +16% new followers during season three.”
“Season three of Total Bellas saw Nikki deciding to call off her high-profile wedding, Brie balancing being a new mom and a successful business woman with her sister, and Daniel Bryan’s sensational return to the WWE ring.”


"Nicky Bella and bribella are also executive producers."
"Total Bellas is produced by WWE and bunim / Murray productions, with Gil goldschein, Russell Jay and farnaz farjam Chazan as executive producer of bunim / Murray productions and Kevin Dunn as executive producer of WWE."
“… It's a green light for the fourth season of its hit series total Bellas. "
"The renewal comes as the series, which is the best number since World War superstars Niki Bella and bribella's life, ended their third season so far."
According to the network and Nielsen, the third season has the highest ratings ever, with nearly 1 million viewers per episode, up 22% from the previous season
"The premiere of total Bellas on Sunday night featured w18-34 and w18-49 ads in support of the cable prime time top 10."
"The average number of social activities in the third quarter exceeded 4 million per week, an increase of 123% compared with that in the third quarter."
"Second season (1.8 mm)."
"Total Bellas currently has 1.1 million social fans, with 16% of new fans in the third quarter."
"In the third season of total Bellas, Nikki decided to cancel her high-profile wedding, Brie and her sister became a new mother and a successful business woman, and Daniel Bryan made a sensational return to WWE."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But clearly, the Lifetime movie plays up it all up for our amusement — likely far more than anything that actually happened in real life.”
“E!”
“In the made for TV movie the almost royal is excluded from a pretty significant Middleton family gathering ahem our girl Pippa s wedding ceremony and as it turns out the real Meghan Markle wasn t at Pippa s wedding ceremony either but she managed to make it to the...”
“...reception...”
“In the movie, the fictional Markle is on the phone with her mother, slightly sad about being left out, when Harry bursts in to take her to the party after all — where she met Harry's parents for the first time.”
“In the film, Kate Middleton blames her sister's "no ring, no bring" policy — meaning only engaged or married couples were allowed — for Markle being benched.”
“(In real life and in the movie, Markle and the prince were not yet betrothed.)”
“As it turns out, this plus one policy was the real deal, but as PEOPLE noted, both James Middleton's longtime girlfriend Donna Air and Princess Eugenie's longtime boyfriend Jack Brooksbank attended the ceremony.”
“Additionally, according to The Telegraph, Markle was fully invited to Middleton's May 2017 wedding despite the "no ring no bring" policy, but at the last moment Markle did not appear at the ceremony itself.”
“So what gives?”


"But it's clear that this lifetime movie is all about our entertainment - probably more than anything that actually happens in real life."
“E！”
"In this movie made for TV, Megan markel, who is almost a member of the royal family, is excluded from a very important family gathering in Middleton. At Pippa's wedding, it turns out that the real Megan markel didn't attend Pippa's wedding, but she successfully arrived..."
“… Reception... "
"In the movie, the fictional markel is talking to her mother on the phone, a little sad about being excluded, and Harry suddenly breaks in and takes her to the party - where she meets Harry's parents for the first time."
In the film, Kate Middleton blames her sister's "no ring, no gift" policy - that is, only engaged or married couples are allowed - for keeping markel on the bench
(in real life and movies, markel and the prince are not engaged yet.)
"It turns out that this one plus one policy is a real deal, but as people have noticed, James Middleton's longtime girlfriend Donna Al and Princess Eugenie's longtime boyfriend Jack Brooksbank both attended the wedding."
"In addition, according to the daily telegraph, despite the" no ring, no ring "policy, markel was fully invited to Middleton's wedding in May 2017, but he did not appear at the last moment."
"What good is that?"



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo: Chris Jackson/Getty Images for the Invictus GaShe changed into some Veja sneakers to go on a boat.”
“Here they are.”
“Meghan Markle and Prince Harry.”
“Crew, and perhaps most notably, a $145 gray blazer from her friend Serena Williams’s line.”
“Kitsuné boots from J”
“Photo Andrew Parsons i Images WireImage The duchess kicked off day two of the royal tour in Dubbo Australia where she wore opted for a casual look which is fitting as she went to a farm black jeans by Outland Denim an Australian brand a white button down by Maison...”
“Meghan Markle in Brandon Maxwell.”
“Photo: Mark Metcalfe/Getty ImagesMeghan ended the day in an olive-green pleated button-up skirt dress by Brandon Maxwell.”
“Photo: Pool/Getty ImagesShe then put on a trench coat over her Karen Gee dress.”


"Photo: Chris Jackson / Getty Images put some Veja shoes on board for Invictus gashe."
"Here they are."
"Megan markel and Prince Harry."
"The staff, perhaps most notably, is a $145 gray jacket from her friend Serena Williams."
"Kitsun é boots from J"
"The picture shows Andrew Parsons I. The Duchess of WireImage starts her second day's royal tour in Dubo, Australia. She chooses a casual dress, which is suitable, because she goes to a farm with black jeans made of Outland jeans, an Australian brand and a white button down by Mason..."
"Megan markel of Brandon Maxwell."
"Photo: Mark Metcalf / Getty Eagles Megan ends the day with Brandon Maxwell's olive green pleated button skirt."
"Photo: pool / Getty Images she then put on a windbreaker over Karen Gee's skirt."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Miller recently shut down rumors of flirting with newly single Brad Pitt, telling Page Six, it’s “silly.””
“The couple called off their engagement in 2015.”
“She added, “It’s not that it’s not complicated because it is.”Sturridge and Miller got engaged in 2012, the same year they welcomed their daughter, Marlowe.”
““We do bedtime every day,” she said, “We felt like as much togetherness as possible would be ideal, and fortunately we really love each other and are best friends, and so that works.”
“And that they fed my kid.”The 35-year-old “Lost City of Z” star also opened up about co-parenting with her ex, Tom Sturridge.”
“But I also sort of like that they’re a little ’70s.”
““I have nipples like fighter pilots’ thumbs.”
““I do miss my breasts being where they were,” the actress said of her post-baby body in the new issue of Allure.”
“...like...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Sienna Miller has us all wondering what fighter pilots thumbs look...”


Miller, who recently denied rumors of flirting with new single Brad Pitt, told page 6 that it was "stupid."
"The couple cancelled their engagement in 2015."
She added: "it's not that things aren't complicated because it is." Strich and Miller got engaged in 2012, the same year they welcomed their daughter Marlow
"We have bedtime every day," she said. "We think it's ideal to be together as much as possible. Fortunately, we really love each other and are best friends, so it works."
The 35 year old "lost Z City" star also made public the idea of raising children with his ex girlfriend Tom Sturridge
"But I also like them a little bit, a little bit in the '70s."
"My nipples are like the thumb of a fighter pilot."
"I really miss my breasts," the actress said of her newborn body in the new issue of temptation
“… It's like
"Click to send this email to a friend to open in a new window click to share on Twitter to open in a new window click to share on Facebook to open Sienna Miller in a new window let's all want to know what the thumb of a fighter pilot looks like..."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...and he s back to being a single man...”
“They want to be the best co parents they can be Lindsay Shookus after his split from Garner and most recently became involved in a fling with Playboy model Shauna Sexton his love life has not turned out too well...”
““They’re on the same page with giving the kids the best possible life,” said the source.”
“Try refreshing your browser, orRadarOnline.com readers know Garner, 46, and Affleck, 46, share three kids together and have gone to great lengths to co-parent them and take them on regular family outings.”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
““She’s ready to start the next phase of her life,” added the insider.”
“Try refreshing your browser, or Jennifer Garner ‘dating someone new’ after finalizing Ben Affleck divorce Back to videoThe happy news comes just one month after she finalized her divorce from her wild ex following his most recent boozy relapse.”
“A source close to the Peppermint actress exclusively told Us Weekly that she has even “started dating someone new!”We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”


“… He's single again... "
"They want to be the best co parents - Lindsay shookus, who recently had an affair with Playboy model Shauna Sexton after breaking up with Ghana - his love life is not so good..."
"They share the same view on giving children the best life," the source said
"Try refreshing your browser, orRadarOnline.com As readers of the website know, Ghana, 46, and Affleck, 46, have three children. They spare no effort to raise their children together and take their family on regular trips. "
“… Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
"She's ready to start the next phase of her life," the person familiar with the matter added
"Try refreshing your browser, or go back to the video with" new date "by Jennifer Garner after finalizing Ben Affleck's divorce. The good news is that a month after she finalized her divorce with her ex boyfriend, her ex boyfriend had a relapse of alcoholism
A source close to the peppermint star told us weekly exclusively that she had even "started dating someone new! "Sorry, this video can't be loaded."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Earlier than the bash, the Beatriz at Dinner star, struck a glamorous pose on a regal-wanting staircase and posted an Instagram photograph with the caption, “#bafta #weekend #london.”Salma was final nominated for a BAFTA in 2003 for her now-controversial position in Frida.”
“It appeared just like the fifty one-yr-previous was all about getting gussied up for the fashionable occasion.”
“Salma is one among a slew of celebs, together with Margot Robbie, Greta Gerwig, Kate Mara, Jamie Bell, Gemma Arterton and Karen Gillan, who’ve descended upon London for British movie’s largest night time of the yr.”
“For the A-listing occasion, the stunner, who additionally wigged out and went blonde for Paris Trend Week in September, outfitted herself in a gown by Gucci.”
“The night time earlier than the 2018 British Academy Movie Awards, the film star switched her signature chocolate locks by rocking a blunt blonde coiffure to attend the BAFTA nominees social gathering at Kensington Palace on Saturday night time.”


"Long before the carnival, the star of the Beatles at the dinner put on a charming pose on a staircase that the emperor wanted, and posted a picture on instagram, which read:" BAFTA · weekend · London. "Salma won BAFTA's final nomination in 2003 for her now controversial position in Frida."
"It looks like it was 51 years ago. It's all about dressing up for fashionable occasions."
Salma is one of many celebrities. Margot Robbie, Greta gweger, Kate Mara, Jamie bell, Gemma arteton and Karen gilland have all come to London for the biggest night performance in British film history
"On the occasion of A-share listing, the stuntman wore a Gucci dress. At Paris Fashion Week in September, she put on a wig and became a blonde."
"One night before the 2018 British Academy Awards, the film star, with her straight blonde hair and her signature chocolate hair, attended the BFA nominees' party at Kensington Palace on Saturday night."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“During a 2015 round of “The Wheel of Musical Impressions” on The Tonight Show, Grande left Jimmy Fallon speechless with her imitations of Britney Spears and Christina Aguilera.”
“Grande crooned “Get Happy” and even gave us a little “Choo Cha Booch.”5And the time Grande showed off just how versatile she was.”
“Aside from her amazing vocal range and her memorable bops, Grande also has an uncanny knack for impressions.”
“It seems like the “No Tears Left To Cry” singer can mimic just about anyone, from Britney Spears to her own fiancé, Pete Davidson.”
“Grande appeared on the August 16th episode of The Tonight Show with Jimmy Fallon to talk about her new album, Sweetener.”
“The singer gave fans a sneak peek of the album’s tracks, including one called “Pete Davidson.” She also reminisced about the time Davidson first met her grandmother over FaceTime.”
““The first time they FaceTimed, she called him David.”
“And she was like, ‘Oh, David, you’re a nice Italian boy, huh?”
“'” Grande continued: “And he was like, ‘Well, I’m only 20%, but I can be more if you want.”The singer’s flawless imitation of Davidson’s mannerisms immediately got a chuckle from the audience.”
“She even lowered her voice as much as possible.”


"In the 2015 round of" the wheel of musical impressions "on the tonight show, grand imitated Britney Spears and Christina Aguilera, leaving Jimmy Fallon speechless."
Grand whispered "be happy" and even gave us a little "Choo cha Booch". Grant showed us how versatile she was
"In addition to her amazing range and unforgettable bounce, grand has an incredible impression technique."
"It seems that this" no tears to cry "singer can imitate almost anyone, from Britney Spears to her fiance, Pete Davidson."
"Grand and Jimmy Fallon appeared on the tonight show on August 16 to talk about her new album sweetener."
The singer gave fans a panoramic view of the album's repertoire, including a song called "Pete Davidson.". She also recalled seeing her grandmother for the first time on FaceTime
"The first time they met, she called him David."
"She said," Oh, David, you're a nice Italian boy, aren't you? "
"Grand went on," he said, 'well, I'm only 20%, but I can be more, if you want. 'the singer perfectly imitated Davidson's behavior and immediately got the audience's laughter
"She even lowered her voice as much as possible."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Red lips and that's it!"”
“It's very practical and I don't need to mess with it.”
“Back in 2015, she said: "I like to wear my hair up.”
“When she isn't defeating villains and being an overall badass, Gal prefers a sensible beauty routine, maintaining a classic look over the years.”
“I like strong lips," she said.”
“"This is a burgundy shade, but I like red too.”
“Gadot revealed her fondness for MAC Red Lipstick in Diva.”
“Even off-screen, the actress shares her character's love for a powerful pucker.”
“To no surprise, the previous Miss Israel has done justice to the role with her impactful, yet effortless, beauty.”
“"Wonder Woman" star Gal Gadot likes to paint her lips with strong colours.”


"That's the red lips!"
"It's practical. I don't need to use it."
Back in 2015, she said, "I like to comb my hair."
"When she doesn't beat the villain and become a villain as a whole, the girl prefers a sensual beauty routine that keeps the classic look for years."
"I like strong lips," she said
"It's purplish red, but I like red, too."
"She revealed her love for MAC red lipstick in the heroine."
"Even outside the screen, the actress likes a strong wrinkle as much as her character does."
"It's not surprising that the former Miss Israel contributed to the role with her infectious but effortless beauty."
Wonder woman star Gail gadote likes to paint her lips in strong colors



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She told us Ricky had not proposed but added, "I was ready yesterday."”
“So, when we saw Danica and Ricky out we asked if there was any movement on the engagement front.”
“Play video content JULY 2017 TMZSports.comHere's the deal ... 35-year-old Danica had pulled an April Fool's gag on social media claiming one of her rings was an engagement ring.”
“Because Danica shared her frustration about the relationship situation back in July.”
“How do we know?”
“Exclusive DetailsDanica Patrick is officially single ... her 5-year relationship with NASCAR driver Ricky Stenhouse Jr. is over after the guy publicly pumped the brakes when it came to marriage.”


She told us that Ricky didn't propose, but added, "I was ready yesterday."
"So when we saw Danica and Ricky out, we asked if there was anything going on at the engagement front."
"Play video content" July 2017 TMZSports.com It's settled here... Danica, 35, played an April Fool's Day joke on social media, claiming that one of her rings was an engagement ring
"Because Danica shared her frustration with me in July."
"How do we know?"
"Exclusive details Danica Patrick is officially single... Her five-year relationship with NASCAR driver Ricky Stenhouse Jr. is over because this guy publicly stepped on the brakes when he got married. "



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or is she really still single?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Christina is just being coy about dating Nate?”
“The exes and network have yet to comment on the future of the show.”
“However, fans of the show have been devastated to hear reports that the show will be ending after its upcoming season.”
“She’s still happily single and focusing on her kids and herself.”Despite ending their marriage in 2016, Christina and Tarek have seemingly remained amicable, even continuing to film their hit HGTV series, Flip or Flop together.”
““She loves taking [her daughter], too.”
“News.”
““[Christina] has been going to Kings game since she was ten years old,” an insider explained to E!”
“Ducks fans as he also sat in the crowd at a game earlier this month clearly not feeling any awkwardness about Nate being on the ice...”
“After Christina attended a game last month the rumor mill quickly started running about her rumored relationship with Nate but at the time her rep confirmed to HollywoodLife com that the two are just friends In fact it seems like Christina and her ex Tarek El Moussa are simply longtime...”


"Or is she really single?"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Christina is just shy when she's dating Nate?"
"My ex-wife and the Internet haven't commented on the future of the show."
"However, fans of the show were shocked to hear that the show would end in the coming season."
"She's still happily single and focused on her children and herself." Although Christina and Tarik ended their marriage in 2016, they still seem to be friendly and even continue to shoot their hit TV series flip flop together
"She likes to take (her daughter) with her, too."
"News."
"(Christina) has been going to the kings since she was 10," an insider told e! "
"Duck fans, because he's also sitting in the crowd, obviously didn't feel any embarrassment in a game at the beginning of this month. Nate is on the ice..."
"After Christina took part in a competition last month, rumors soon began to spread about her affair with Nate, but her representative confirmed to Hollywood Life website at that time that they were just friends. In fact, Christina and her former Tariq El Moussa seem to have been in love for a long time..."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...simply saying That has been resolved...”
“According to the actress patriarchy has created a siloed off experience for women not just actresses with one answer for what a good life looks like Ross whose mother is none other than the one and only Diana Ross grew up with what many could say was a unique model...”
“As reported by E!, during a special interview with Vanity Fair, Ross was asked questions about having kids where she bluntly made it clear that some boundaries need to be set and not everything is up for discussion when it comes to her personal and private life.”
“The cover model and actress sat down with the magazine and gave her thoughts on how she feels constantly being asked about whether she plans on having kids or not.”
“Back in 2016 and 2017 for example, Ross, who was promoting the third season of her show Black-ish was constantly asked whether the 45-year-old ever plans on having kids.”
“Because Ross’ character in the series was expecting her fifth child, she was often asked whether she ever wanted to become a mother in real life.”
““Last year, I was pregnant all season.”
“That brought on a lot of comments and questions and pontifications from people with no invitation.”The former model and actress told the magazine that she was forced to shut down the questions in a no-nonsense way, pretty much telling everyone to back off.”
““I literally have said to people, for real, no joke, ‘Why don’t you just get out of my womb?”
“Like, get out of my uterus.”


“… In short, it has been solved... "
"According to the actress, patriarchy creates an island like experience for women. It's not just the actress who has an answer to Rose's wonderful life. Her mother is the only one. Only Diana Rose grew up with many people who can be said to be unique models..."
"According to e! In a special interview with vanity fair, when asked about giving birth to children, rose bluntly said that in terms of personal and private life, there are some boundaries that need to be set, and not everything can be discussed. "
"The cover model and actress expressed her thoughts as she sat next to the magazine and was constantly asked if she planned to have a baby."
"For example, in 2016 and 2017, when Ross was promoting the third season of her show black ISH, he was often asked if rose, 45, was going to have children."
"Because rose's character is pregnant with her fifth child, people often ask her if she wants to be a real-life mother."
"Last year, I was pregnant all season."
"It caused a lot of comments, questions and talk from people who were not invited." The former model and actress told the magazine that she was forced to close the issues in a meaningless way, almost telling everyone to step back. "
"I really told people, stop kidding, why don't you come out of my womb?"
"Come out of my womb, for example."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“American Gods is a meta-myth that’s getting a new layer laid on top of it, an exceedingly appropriate fate for a book about what happens to gods as the times and places change.”
“Now the novel is itself a metaphorical story that’s being built upon and re-interpreted for a new age, like the myths that Gaiman builds on.”
“Did I want to experience the show as its own unique thing or should I go back to the book and reacquaint myself with the plot?”
“The decision to go back to Neil Gaiman’s modern fantasy epic won out and I feel like I made the right choice, one that will change the way I watch the series.”
“Based on what I’ve seen of the upcoming American Gods TV show, the main difference between the series and the award-winning 2001 novel it’s based on will be one of tonal approach.”
“Both things tell the same story, where an ex-con named Shadow acts as bodyguard to older con man Wednesday as the latter prepares for a reckoning between old and new gods, but the color gradients feel different.”
“The TV adaptation of American Gods glimmers more brightly than the book.”
“It’s not in the art direction or color choices so much as the self-consciously askew aesthetic of the show, which presents a fictional landscape where celestial energies are still flowing through the world.”
“They show up in sharp neon contrast to the mundanity that we know.”
“There’s a puckish playfulness in the performances, special effects, and shot angles that make the Starz series vibrate on a radiant wavelength.”


"The American gods are a meta myth, which is being placed on a new level. It is a very suitable fate for a book about what happens to the gods as time and place change."
"Now the novel itself is a metaphorical story, which is based on a new era and reinterpreted, just like the myth established by Gayman."
"Do I want to experience this play as my own unique thing, or should I go back to the book and get familiar with the plot again?"
"The decision to go back to Neil Gaiman's modern fantasy epic won, and I think I made the right choice, which will change the way I watch the series."
"According to my understanding of the upcoming American gods TV series, the main difference between this TV series and the award-winning novel in 2001 will be the choice of tone."
"These two events tell the same story. A former prisoner named shadow acted as the bodyguard of the old liar on Wednesday. The latter was ready to settle accounts between the old and the new gods, but the color change was different."
"The TV series adapted from American gods is more dazzling than this book."
"It's not so much in the choice of artistic direction or color as in the self-conscious skew aesthetic in the play. It presents a fictional landscape, and the energy in the sky is still flowing in the world."
"They are in sharp contrast to what we know as commonplace."
"There is a playful playfulness in performance, special effects and shooting angle, which makes the Starz series vibrate at the radiation wavelength."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Whether you're looking for some money advice from your famous counterparts or you want to know how they spend their cash, you can find those kinds of articles — and more — on GOBankingRates.”
“GOBankingRates features articles related to celebrities and their personal finances.”
“You can learn a lot about money management from celebrities, including what to do and what not to do —here’s looking at you, Kanye West — with your money.”
“Since celebrities earn more than the average person, you might think you’re on different playing fields and can’t learn anything from the way they manage their money.”
“Although many fans devour entertainment magazines to see how their favorite Hollywood celebrities spent their weekends or learn about their newest projects, fans can also find stories about stars’ personal finances.”
“About CelebritiesIf you're obsessed with a particular celebrity, you might read every article you can find about that person.”


"Whether you want some financial advice from your famous peers or how they spend their money, you can find articles like go banking rates or more."
"Go banking rates publishes articles about celebrities and their personal financial status."
"You can learn a lot about financial management from celebrities, including what you do and don't do with your money - Kanye West, let's see you."
"Since celebrities earn more than ordinary people, you may think that you are in a different competitive environment and can't learn anything from their financial management."
"Although many fans will read entertainment magazines to see how their favorite Hollywood stars spend their weekends or learn about their latest projects, they can also find stories about their personal financial situation."
"About celebrities if you're obsessed with a celebrity, you might read every article you can find about that person."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Lifestyle:Follow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter for nonstop inspiration delivered fresh to your feed, every day.”
“Whether or not the “babies” themselves will — kids will be kids, after all — remains to be seen.”
“So, the public approves.”
“Story continuesMany fans were touched by the Vampire Diaries star’s tribute to his wife, saying they “need someone like [him]” in their lives.”
“Like Paltrow, she is completely unclothed and using her hand to cover her chest.”
“Somerhalder himself took the photo, which was “liked” by Reed on Instagram.”
“Actor Ian Somerhalder marked wife Nikki Reed’s first Mother’s Day as a parent by posting a nude maternity photo from her pregnancy with their daughter, Bodhi Soleil, who turns 1 in July.”
“Paltrow’s not the only star who chose to share a private pregnancy photo for Mother’s Day.”
“Apple Martin, whose father is Coldplay frontman Chris Martin, turns 14 on May 14, making it a double celebration of sorts for the family.”
“According to her caption, the 45-year-old Goop founder was pregnant with the older of her two children when the revealing image was taken.”


"Read more about Yahoo's lifestyle: follow us on instagram, Facebook and Twitter to provide fresh inspiration for your feed every day."
"It remains to be seen whether 'babies' themselves will - children will be children after all."
"So, the public is for it."
As the story goes on, many fans are moved by the Vampire Diaries star's greeting to his wife, saying that they "need people like him in life."
"Like Paltrow, she's completely undressed and covers her chest with her hands."
"This picture of summerhard himself was" liked "by reed on instagram."
Actor Ian Somerhalder has posted nude photos of his wife Nikki reed pregnant with her daughter Bodhi Soleil, who was 1 years old in July, in honor of her first mother's day
"Paltrow is not the only star to choose to share private pregnancy photos on Mother's day."
"Apple Martin's father is Chris Martin, the leader of Coldplay. He will turn 14 on May 14, which is a double celebration for the family."
"According to her description, when the exposed photo was taken, the 45 year old founder of Google was pregnant with the older of two children."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SubmitThe 37-year-old hockey star began his career in hockey with the Ottawa Senators, where he became known for his aggressive play style and eventual offensive production.”
“SubmitFree CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“Unfortunately, they fell short of bagging the Stanley Cup Final trophy after losing to the Pittsburgh Penguins in six games.”
“Fisher scored 18 goals and 24 assists last season, helping the Predators make it to the Western Conference title.”
“Isaiah and I love you so much and are so excited to be able to have you home a lot more...We can't wait to cheer on the Nashville Predators WITH you in the stands!”
“You've given your teammates and the game your all for so many years...you've worked so hard and made us all so proud!”
“But I so look forward to seeing what God has in store for you in this next chapter of your life.”
“A post shared by Carrie Underwood (@carrieunderwood) on Aug 3, 2017 at 6:33am PDTUnderwood posted a photo of her husband in action in the rink and wrote in the caption how she will miss watching him play and "cheering you on with the rest of Smashville."”
“The Nashville Predators captain made the announcement in a penned letter published on The Tennessean, explaining that it was "the hardest decision" he ever had to make, but he knows it is the right one.”


The 37 year old hockey star began his hockey career with the Ottawa Senators, where he was known for his aggressive play and ultimate offensive performance
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get daily planned headlines and special offers!"
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
"Unfortunately, they failed to win the Stanley Cup final after losing six games to the Pittsburgh Penguins
"Fisher scored 18 goals and assisted 24 times last season to help the marauders win the western conference championship."
"Isaiah and I love you so much that I'm very excited to have you back home more We can't wait to join you in the stands to cheer for the Nashville Raiders
"Over the years, you've given everything to your teammates and the game You work so hard, we are all so proud
"But I'm looking forward to seeing what God has prepared for you in the next chapter of your life."
"Carrie Underwood (@ CarrieUnderwood) posted a photo of her husband at the rink at 6:33 a.m. on August 3, 2017 on pdtunderwood, and wrote in the title how she would miss watching his game and" cheering for you with the rest of smarsville "
The Nashville Predators captain announced the news in a letter published on the Tennessee, explaining that it was the "hardest decision" he had made, but he knew it was the right one



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You go on the show and you want to find someone and you want to fall in love and you want to have a family and so then they see it happening and they’re so rooting for that,” Waddell adds.”
““Bachelor Nation loves success stories.”
“...away and it s time to celebrate...”
“The Bachelor in Paradise alums were joined by their loved ones at a sweet shower on Sunday ahead of the arrival of their first child: a baby girl they revealed would be named Isabella Evelyn.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’m feeling a little nervous but mostly excited,” the mom-to-be, 32, tells PEOPLE in an exclusive video of the whimsical, pink-powered event.”
““It’s like a month away or sooner, or maybe later, but I’m going with hopefully a month or sooner just mostly because I want her to come out as fast as possible.”
“I’m excited to meet her,” adds Waddell.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"You're on the show, you want to find someone, you want to fall in love, you want to have a family, and then they see it all happening, and they're very supportive of that," Waddell added
"Bachelor countries love success stories."
“… Leave, it's time to celebrate... "
"The alumni of the Bachelor of heaven attended a sweet shower with their relatives on Sunday before their first child was born: they revealed a baby girl named Isabella Evelyn."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I feel a little nervous, but most of them are excited," the 32 year old mother to be told people in an exclusive video about the fanciful pink event
"It's about a month, or earlier, or later, but I hope to go a month or earlier, mainly because I want her to come out as soon as possible."
"I'm glad to see her," Vader added
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you think these two are in it for the long haul?”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you love that Alex and Jennifer spent Easter together with their kids?”
“But what’s making it even better is their kids!”
“Celebrating Easter together, the two fams joined forces and had an epic holiday — reportedly complete with a fun-filled egg hunt!”
“You’ll love these family pics!”
“Looks like the Easter bunny brought Jennifer Lopez‘s, 47, and Alex Rodriguez‘s, 41, kids together!”
“While Jen and A-Rod have been spending the past fews day together in the Dominican Republic, their children joined them for the Easter holiday, and the families apparently had one amazing time together!”
“Alex even posted two adorable pics on Instagram, showing the joint fams doing various activities together.”
“In his first photo, Alex can be seen wearing all white while lounging on a white leather couch.”
“To his left are his two daughters Natasha Alexander, 12, and Ella Alexander, 8.”


"Do you think these two are long-term?"
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - do you like Alex and Jennifer spending Easter with their kids?"
"But their children make things better!"
"Celebrating Easter together, the two families joined hands for an epic Festival - said to have completed a fun egg hunt!"
"You'll love these family photos!"
"It seems that the Easter Bunny has brought together the children of Jennifer Lopez, 47, and Alex Rodriguez, 41!"
"Jan and A-Rod spent the past holidays together in the Dominican Republic, their children spent the Easter holiday with them, and it's obvious that their family had a wonderful time together!"
"Alex even posted two lovely photos on instagram, showing these families doing various activities together."
"In his first photo, you can see Alex lying lazily on the white leather sofa in all white clothes."
On the left are his two daughters, Natasha Alexander, 12, and Ella Alexander, 8



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.29
Correct number is  29
Total number is  100
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
